Rosa Luxemburg
The Junius Pamphlet
The Crisis of German Social Democracy
(1915)


Chapter 1

The scene has changed fundamentally. The six weeks’ march to Paris has grown 
into a world drama.[1] Mass slaughter has become the tiresome and monotonous 
business of the day and the end is no closer. Bourgeois statecraft is held fast 
in its own vise. The spirits summoned up can no longer be exorcised.

Gone is the euphoria. Gone the patriotic noise in the streets, the chase after 
the gold-colored automobile, one false telegram after another, the wells 
poisoned by cholera, the Russian students heaving bombs over every railway 
bridge in Berlin, the French airplanes over Nuremberg, the spy hunting public 
running amok in the streets, the swaying crowds in the coffee shops with 
ear-deafening patriotic songs surging ever higher, whole city neighborhoods 
transformed into mobs ready to denounce, to mistreat women, to shout hurrah and 
to induce delirium in themselves by means of wild rumors. Gone, too, is the 
atmosphere of ritual murder, the Kishinev air where the crossing guard is the 
only remaining representative of human dignity.[2]

The spectacle is over. German scholars, those “stumbling lemurs,” have been 
whistled off the stage long ago. The trains full of reservists are no longer 
accompanied by virgins fainting from pure jubilation. They no longer greet the 
people from the windows of the train with joyous smiles. Carrying their packs, 
they quietly trot along the streets where the public goes about its daily 
business with aggrieved visages.

In the prosaic atmosphere of pale day there sounds a different chorus – the 
hoarse cries of the vulture and the hyenas of the battlefield. Ten thousand 
tarpaulins guaranteed up to regulations! A hundred thousand kilos of bacon, 
cocoa powder, coffee-substitute – c.o.d, immediate delivery! Hand grenades, 
lathes, cartridge pouches, marriage bureaus for widows of the fallen, leather 
belts, jobbers for war orders – serious offers only! The cannon fodder loaded 
onto trains in August and September is moldering in the killing fields of 
Belgium, the Vosges, and Masurian Lakes where the profits are springing up like 
weeds. It’s a question of getting the harvest into the barn quickly. Across the 
ocean stretch thousands of greedy hands to snatch it up.

Business thrives in the ruins. Cities become piles of ruins; villages become 
cemeteries; countries, deserts; populations are beggared; churches, horse 
stalls. International law, treaties and alliances, the most sacred words and 
the highest authority have been torn in shreds. Every sovereign “by the grace 
of God” is called a rogue and lying scoundrel by his cousin on the other side. 
Every diplomat is a cunning rascal to his colleagues in the other party. Every 
government sees every other as dooming its own people and worthy only of 
universal contempt. There are food riots in Venice, in Lisbon, Moscow, 
Singapore. There is plague in Russia, and misery and despair everywhere.

Violated, dishonored, wading in blood, dripping filth – there stands bourgeois 
society. This is it [in reality]. Not all spic and span and moral, with 
pretense to culture, philosophy, ethics, order, peace, and the rule of law – 
but the ravening beast, the witches’ sabbath of anarchy, a plague to culture 
and humanity. Thus it reveals itself in its true, its naked form.

In the midst of this witches’ sabbath a catastrophe of world-historical 
proportions has happened: International Social Democracy has capitulated. To 
deceive ourselves about it, to cover it up, would be the most foolish, the most 
fatal thing the proletariat could do. Marx says: “...the democrat (that is, the 
petty bourgeois revolutionary) [comes] out of the most shameful defeats as 
unmarked as he naively went into them; he comes away with the newly gained 
conviction that he must be victorious, not that he or his party ought to give 
up the old principles, but that conditions ought to accommodate him.”[3] The 
modern proletariat comes out of historical tests differently. Its tasks and its 
errors are both gigantic: no prescription, no schema valid for every case, no 
infallible leader to show it the path to follow. Historical experience is its 
only school mistress. Its thorny way to self-emancipation is paved not only 
with immeasurable suffering but also with countless errors. The aim of its 
journey – its emancipation depends on this – is whether the proletariat can 
learn from its own errors. Self-criticism, remorseless, cruel, and going to the 
core of things is the life’s breath and light of the proletarian movement. The 
fall of the socialist proletariat in the present world war is unprecedented. It 
is a misfortune for humanity. But socialism will be lost only if the 
international proletariat fails to measure the depth of this fall, if it 
refuses to learn from it.

The last forty-five year period in the development of the modern labor movement 
now stands in doubt. What we are experiencing in this critique is a closing of 
accounts for what will soon be half a century of work at our posts. The grave 
of the Paris Commune ended the first phase of the European labor movement as 
well as the First International.[4] Since then there began a new phase. In 
place of spontaneous revolutions, risings, and barricades, after which the 
proletariat each time fell back into passivity, there began the systematic 
daily struggle, the exploitation of bourgeois parliamentarianism, mass 
organizations, the marriage of the economic with the political struggle, and 
that of socialist ideals with stubborn defense of immediate daily interests. 
For the first time the polestar of strict scientific teachings lit the way for 
the proletariat and for its emancipation. Instead of sects, schools, utopias, 
and isolated experiments in various countries, there arose a uniform, 
international theoretical basis which bound countries together like the strands 
of a rope. Marxist knowledge gave the working class of the entire world a 
compass by which it can make sense of the welter of daily events and by which 
it can always plot the right course to take to the fixed and final goal.

She who bore, championed, and protected this new method was German Social 
Democracy. The [Franco-Prussian] War and the defeat of the Paris Commune had 
shifted the center of gravity for the European workers’ movement to Germany. As 
France was the classic site of the first phase of proletarian class struggle 
and Paris the beating, bleeding heart of the European laboring classes of those 
times, so the German workers became the vanguard of the second phase. By means 
of countless sacrifices and tireless attention to detail, they have built the 
strongest organization, the one most worthy of emulation; they created the 
biggest press, called the most effective means of education and enlightenment 
into being, gathered the most powerful masses of voters and attained the 
greatest number of parliamentary mandates. German Social Democracy was 
considered the purest embodiment of Marxist socialism. She had and laid claim 
to a special place in the Second International - its instructress and leader.[5]

In his famous 1895 foreword to Marx’s The Class Struggles in France, 1848-1850, 
Friedrich Engels wrote:

``“No matter what happens in other countries, German Social Democracy has a 
special position and therefore a special task, at least for the time being. The 
two million voters it sends to the ballot box, and the young men and women who, 
although non-voters, stand behind them, constitute the most numerous and 
compact mass, the ‘decisive force’ of the proletarian army.”``

German Social Democracy, as the Vienna Arbeiterzeitung wrote on August 5, 1914, 
was “the jewel of class-conscious proletarian organizations.” In her footsteps 
trod the increasingly enthusiastic Social Democrats of France, Italy, and 
Belgium, the labor movements of Holland, Scandinavia, Switzerland, and the 
United States. The Slavic countries, the Russians, the Social Democrats of the 
Balkans looked upon [German Social Democracy] with limitless, nearly 
uncritical, admiration. In the Second International the German “decisive force” 
played the determining role. At the [international] congresses, in the meetings 
of the international socialist bureaus, all awaited the opinion of the Germans. 
Especially in the questions of the struggle against militarism and war, German 
Social Democracy always took the lead. “For us Germans that is unacceptable” 
regularly sufficed to decide the orientation of the Second International, which 
blindly bestowed its confidence upon the admired leadership of the mighty 
German Social Democracy: the pride of every socialist and the terror of the 
ruling classes everywhere.

And what did we in Germany experience when the great historical test came? The 
most precipitous fall, the most violent collapse. Nowhere has the organization 
of the proletariat been yoked so completely to the service of imperialism. 
Nowhere is the state of siege borne so docilely.[6] Nowhere is the press so 
hobbled, public opinion so stifled, the economic and political class struggle 
of the working class so totally surrendered as in Germany.

But German Social Democracy was not merely the strongest vanguard troop, it was 
the thinking head of the International. For this reason, we must begin the 
analysis, the self-examination process, with its fall. It has the duty to begin 
the salvation of international socialism, that means unsparing criticism of 
itself. None of the other parties, none of the other classes of bourgeois 
society, may look clearly and openly into the mirror of their own errors, their 
own weaknesses, for the mirror reflects their historical limitations and the 
historical doom that awaits them. The working class can boldly look truth 
straight in the face, even the bitterest self-renunciation, for its weaknesses 
are only confusion. The strict law of history gives back its power, stands 
guarantee for its final victory.

Unsparing self-criticism is not merely an essential for its existence but the 
working class’s supreme duty. On our ship we have the most valuable treasures 
of mankind, and the proletariat is their ordained guardian! And while bourgeois 
society, shamed and dishonored by the bloody orgy, rushes headlong toward its 
doom, the international proletariat must and will gather up the golden treasure 
that, in a moment of weakness and confusion in the chaos of the world war, it 
has allowed to sink to the ground.

One thing is certain. The world war is a turning point. It is foolish and mad 
to imagine that we need only survive the war, like a rabbit waiting out the 
storm under a bush, in order to fall happily back into the old routine once it 
is over. The world war has altered the conditions of our struggle and, most of 
all, it has changed us. Not that the basic law of capitalist development, the 
life-and-death war between capital and labor, will experience any amelioration. 
But now, in the midst of the war, the masks are falling and the old familiar 
visages smirk at us. The tempo of development has received a mighty jolt from 
the eruption of the volcano of imperialism. The violence of the conflicts in 
the bosom of society, the enormousness of the tasks that tower up before the 
socialist proletariat – these make everything that has transpired in the 
history of the workers’ movement seem a pleasant idyll.

Historically, this war was ordained to thrust forward the cause of the 
proletariat ... It was ordained to drive the German proletariat to the pinnacle 
of the nation and thereby begin to organize the international and universal 
conflict between capital and labor for political power within the state.

And did we envision a different role for the working class in the world war? 
Let us recall how we, only a short while ago, were accustomed to describe the 
future:

``Then comes the catastrophe. Then the great mobilization will take place in 
Europe; 16-18 million men, the flower of the various nations, armed with the 
best tools of death, will enter the field as enemies. But, I am convinced, that 
behind the great mobilization there stands the great havoc. It will not come 
through our agency, but rather yours. You are driving things to the limit. You 
are leading us to catastrophe. You will reap what you have sown. The 
Götterdämmerung of the bourgeois world approaches. Believe it! It is 
approaching! [All italics are Luxemburg’s.]``

Thus spoke our leader, [August] Bebel[7], during the Reichstag debate on the 
Morocco Crisis.

Imperialism or Socialism?, the official party pamphlet distributed in hundreds 
of thousands of copies a few years ago, closes with these words:

``Thus the struggle against imperialism develops ever more into the decisive 
struggle between capital and labor. War crises, rising prices, capitalism vs. 
peace, welfare for all, socialism! Thus is the question stated. History is 
moving toward great decisions. The proletariat must work unceasingly at its 
world-historical task, strengthen its organization, the clarity of its 
understanding. Then come what may, be it that [proletarian] power spares 
mankind the terrible cruelty of a world war, or be it that the capitalist world 
sinks into history in the same way as it was born, in blood and violence. [In 
either case] the historical hour will find the working class prepared – and 
preparation is everything. [All italics are Luxemburg’s.]``

The official Handbook for Social-Democratic Voters (1911), for the last 
Reichstag election, says on p.42 concerning the expected world war:

``Do our rulers and ruling classes expect the peoples to permit this awful 
thing? Will not a cry of horror, of scorn, of outrage not seize the peoples and 
cause them to put an end to this murder? Will they not ask: For whom? what’s it 
all for? Are we mentally disturbed to be treated this way, to allow ourselves 
to be so treated? He who is calmly convinced of the probability of a great 
European war can come to no other conclusion than the following: The next 
European war will be such a desperate gamble as the world has never seen. In 
all probability it will be the last war.``

With speeches and words such as these, our current Reichstag deputies acquired 
their 110 mandates.

In the summer of 1911, when the Panther made its lunge to Agadir[8] and the 
noisy agitation of the German imperialists put war in the immediate offing, an 
international meeting in London accepted the following resolution (August 4, 
1911):

``The delegates of the German, Spanish, English, Dutch, and French workers’ 
organizations declare themselves to be ready to oppose any declaration of war 
with all the means at their disposal. Every represented nation undertakes the 
obligation, according to the resolutions of national and international 
congresses, to act against all criminal machinations of the ruling classes.``

When, in November 1912, the congress of the International met in the minster at 
Basel and when the long procession of worker representatives entered the 
cathedral, everyone present felt a presentiment of the greatness of the coming 
destiny and a heroic resolve.

The cool, skeptical Victor Adler spoke:

``omrades, the most important thing is that we are here at the common source of 
our strength, that we can draw from this strength so that each can do in his 
own country what he can, according to the forms and means that we have, to 
oppose the crime of war with all the power we possess. And if it can be 
stopped, if it is really stopped, then we must see to it that it becomes a 
cornerstone for the end [of bourgeois society]. This is the moving spirit for 
the whole International. And if murder and arson and pestilence are unleashed 
throughout civilized Europe – we can only think of this with horror, outrage 
and indignation churning in our breasts. And we ask ourselves: are we men, are 
the proletarians of today still sheep that they can be led dumbly to slaughter? 
...``

And [Jean] Jaurès concluded the reading of the International Bureau’s manifesto 
against the war with these words:

``The International represents all the moral force of the world! And if the 
tragic hour strikes and we must give ourselves up to it, the consciousness of 
this will support and strengthen us. We do not merely say “no” but from the 
depth of our hearts we declare ourselves ready to sacrifice everything.``

It was reminiscent of the Oath of Ruetli.[9] The world directed its gaze to the 
church at Basel where the bell sounded solemnly for the future great battle 
between the army of labor and the power of capital ...

Even a week before the outbreak of war, on July 26, 1914, German party 
newspapers wrote:

``We are not marionettes. We combat with all our energy a system that makes men 
into will-less tools of blind circumstance, this capitalism that seeks to 
transform a Europe thirsting for peace into a steaming slaughterhouse. If 
destruction has its way, if the united will to peace of the German, the 
international proletariat, which will make itself known in powerful 
demonstrations in the coming days, if the world war cannot be fended off, then 
at least this should be the last war, it should become the G?tterd?mmerung of 
capitalism. (Frankfurter Volksstimme)``

Then on July 30, 1914, the central organ of German Social Democracy stated:

``The socialist proletariat rejects any responsibility for the events being 
brought about by a blinded, a maddened ruling class. Let it be known that a new 
life shall bloom from the ruins. All responsibility falls to the wielders of 
power today! It is “to be or not to be!” “World-history is the world-court!”``

And then came the unheard of, the unprecedented, the 4th of August 1914.

Did it have to come? An event of this scope is certainly no game of chance. It 
must have deep and wide-reaching objective causes. These causes can, however, 
also lie in the errors of the leader of the proletariat, the Social Democrats, 
in the waning of our fighting spirit, our courage, and loyalty to our 
convictions. Scientific socialism has taught us to comprehend the objective 
laws of historical development. Men do not make history according to their own 
free will. But they make history nonetheless. Proletarian action is dependent 
upon the degree of maturity in social development. However, social development 
is not independent of the proletariat but is equally its driving force and 
cause, its effect and consequence. [Proletarian] action participates in 
history. And while we can as little skip a stage of historical development as 
escape our shadow, we can certainly accelerate or retard history.

Socialism is the first popular movement in world history that has set itself 
the goal of bringing human consciousness, and thereby free will, into play in 
the social actions of mankind. For this reason, Friedrich Engels designated the 
final victory of the socialist proletariat a leap of humanity from the animal 
world into the realm of freedom. This “leap” is also an iron law of history 
bound to the thousands of seeds of a prior torment-filled and all-too-slow 
development. But this can never be realized until the development of complex 
material conditions strikes the incendiary spark of conscious will in the great 
masses. The victory of socialism will not descend from heaven. It can only be 
won by a long chain of violent tests of strength between the old and the new 
powers. The international proletariat under the leadership of the Social 
Democrats will thereby learn to try to take its history into its own hands; 
instead of remaining a will-less football, it will take the tiller of social 
life and become the pilot to the goal of its own history.

Friedrich Engels once said: “Bourgeois society stands at the crossroads, either 
transition to socialism or regression into barbarism.” What does “regression 
into barbarism” mean to our lofty European civilization? Until now, we have all 
probably read and repeated these words thoughtlessly, without suspecting their 
fearsome seriousness. A look around us at this moment shows what the regression 
of bourgeois society into barbarism means. This world war is a regression into 
barbarism. The triumph of imperialism leads to the annihilation of 
civilization. At first, this happens sporadically for the duration of a modern 
war, but then when the period of unlimited wars begins it progresses toward its 
inevitable consequences. Today, we face the choice exactly as Friedrich Engels 
foresaw it a generation ago: either the triumph of imperialism and the collapse 
of all civilization as in ancient Rome, depopulation, desolation, degeneration 
– a great cemetery. Or the victory of socialism, that means the conscious 
active struggle of the international proletariat against imperialism and its 
method of war. This is a dilemma of world history, an either/or; the scales are 
wavering before the decision of the class-conscious proletariat. The future of 
civilization and humanity depends on whether or not the proletariat resolves 
manfully to throw its revolutionary broadsword into the scales. In this war 
imperialism has won. Its bloody sword of genocide has brutally tilted the scale 
toward the abyss of misery. The only compensation for all the misery and all 
the shame would be if we learn from the war how the proletariat can seize 
mastery of its own destiny and escape the role of the lackey to the ruling 
classes.

Dearly bought is the modern working class’s understanding of its historical 
vocation. Its emancipation as a class is sown with fearful sacrifices, a 
veritable path to Golgotha. The June days, the sacrifice of the Commune, the 
martyrs of the Russian Revolution – a dance of bloody shadows without 
number.[10] All fell on the field of honor. They are, as Marx wrote about the 
heroes of the Commune, eternally “enshrined in the great heart of the working 
class.” Now, millions of proletarians of all tongues fall upon the field of 
dishonor, of fratricide, lacerating themselves while the song of the slave is 
on their lips. This, too, we are not spared. We are like the Jews that Moses 
led through the desert. But we are not lost, and we will be victorious if we 
have not unlearned how to learn. And if the present leaders of the proletariat, 
the Social Democrats, do not understand how to learn, then they will go under 
“to make room for people capable of dealing with a new world.”



Chapter 2

``“We are now facing the irrevocable fact of war. We are threatened by the 
horrors of invasion. The decision, today, is not for or against war; for us 
there can be but one question: by what means is this war to be conducted? Much, 
aye everything, is at stake for our people and its future, if Russian 
despotism, stained with the blood of its own people, should be the victor. This 
danger must be averted, the civilisation and the independence of our people 
must be safeguarded. Therefore we will carry out what we have always promised: 
in the hour of danger we will not desert our fatherland. In this we feel that 
we stand in harmony with the International, which has always recognised the 
right of every people to its national independence, as we stand in agreement 
with the International in emphatically denouncing every war of conquest. 
Actuated by these motives, we vote in favour of the war credits demanded by the 
Government.”``

With these words the Reichstag group issued the countersign that determined and 
controlled the position of the German working class during the war. Fatherland 
in danger, national defence, people’s war for existence, Kultur, liberty – 
these were the slogans proclaimed by the parliamentary representatives of the 
social democracy. What followed was but the logical sequence. The position of 
the party and the labour union press, the patriotic frenzy of the masses, the 
civil peace, the disintegration of the International, all these things were the 
inevitable consequence of that momentous orientation in the Reichstag.

If it is true that this war is really a fight for national existence, for 
freedom, if it is true that these priceless possessions can be defended only by 
the iron tools of murder, if this war is the holy cause of the people, then 
everything else follows as a matter of course, we must take everything that the 
war may bring as a part of the bargain. He who desires the purpose must be 
satisfied with the means. War is methodical, organised, gigantic murder. But in 
normal human beings this systematic murder is possible only when a state of 
intoxication has been previously created. This has always been the tried and 
proven method of those who make war. Bestiality of action must find a 
commensurate bestiality of thought and senses; the latter must prepare and 
accompany the former. Thus the Wahre Jacob of August 28, 1914, with its brutal 
picture of the German thresher, the party papers of Chemnitz, Hamburg, Kiel, 
Frankfurt, Koburg and others, with their patriotic drive in poetry and prose, 
were the necessary narcotic for a proletariat that could rescue its existence 
and its liberty only by plunging the deadly steel into its French and English 
brothers. These chauvinistic papers are after all a great deal more logical and 
consistent than those others who attempted to unite hill and valley, war with 
humanity, murder with brotherly love, the voting for war credits with socialist 
internationalism.

If the stand taken by the German Reichstag group on the fourth of August was 
correct, then the death sentence of the proletarian International has been 
spoken, not only for this war, but forever. For the first time since the modern 
labour movement exists there yawns an abyss between the commandments of 
international solidarity of the proletariat of the world and the interests of 
freedom and nationalist existence of the people; for the first time we discover 
that the independence and liberty of the nations command that working men kill 
and destroy each other. Up to this time we have cherished the belief that the 
interests of the peoples of all nations, that the class interests of the 
proletariat are a harmonious unit, that they are identical, that they cannot 
possibly come into conflict with one another. That was the basis of our theory 
and practice, the soul of our agitation. Were we mistaken in the cardinal point 
of our whole world philosophy? We are holding an inquest over international 
socialism.

This world war is not the first crisis through which our international 
principles have passed. Our party was first tried forty-five years ago. At that 
time, on the twenty-first of July, 1870, Wilhelm Liebknecht and August Bebel 
made the following historical declaration before the Reichstag:

``“The present war is a dynastic war in the interest of the Bonaparte dynasty 
as the war of 1866 was conducted in the interest of the Hollenzollern dynasty.

“We cannot vote for the funds which are demanded from the Reichstag to conduct 
this war because this would be, in effect, a vote of confidence in the Prussian 
government. And we know that the Prussian government by its action in 1866 
prepared this war. At the same time we cannot vote against the budget, lest 
this be construed to mean that we support the conscienceless and criminal 
policies of Bonaparte.

“As opponents, on principle, of every dynastic war, as socialist republicans 
and members of the International Workingmen’s Association which, without regard 
to nationality, has fought all oppressors, has tried to unite all the oppressed 
into a great band of brothers, we cannot directly or indirectly lend support to 
the present war. We therefore refuse to vote, while expressing the earnest hope 
that the peoples of Europe, taught by the present unholy events, will strive to 
win the right to control their own destinies, to do away with the present rule 
of might and class as the cause of all social and national evil.”``

With this declaration the representatives of the German proletariat put their 
cause clearly and unreservedly under the banner of the International and 
definitely repudiated the war against France as a national war of independence. 
It is well known that Bebel, many years later, in his memoirs, stated that he 
would have voted against the war loan had he known, when the vote was taken, 
the things that were revealed in the years that followed.

Thus, in a war that was considered by the whole bourgeois public, and by a 
powerful majority of the people under the influence of Bismarckian strategy, as 
a war in the national life interest of Germany, the leaders of the German 
social democracy held firmly to the conviction that the life interest of a 
nation and the class interest of the proletariat are one, that both are opposed 
to war. It was left to the present world war and to the social democratic 
Reichstag group to uncover, for the first time, the terrible dilemma: either 
you are for national liberty – or for international socialism.

Now the fundamental fact in the declaration of our Reichstag group was, in all 
probability, a sudden inspiration. It was simply an echo of the crown speech 
and of the chancellor’s speech of August 4. “We are not driven by the desire 
for conquest,” we hear in the crown speech, “we are inspired by the unalterable 
determination to preserve the land upon which God has placed us for ourselves, 
and for all coming generations. From the documents that have been presented to 
you, you will have seen how my government, and above all my chancellor strove, 
to the last, to avert the utmost. We grasp the sword in self-defence, with a 
clear conscience and a clean hand.” And Bethmann-Hollweg declared:

``“Gentlemen, we are acting in self-defence, and necessity knows no law. He who 
is threatened as we are threatened, he who is fighting for the highest aims can 
be guided by but one consideration, how best to beat his way out of the 
struggle. We are fighting for the fruits of our peaceful labour, for the 
heritage of our great past, for the future of our nation.”``

Wherein does this differ from the social democratic declaration? (1) We have 
done everything to preserve peace, the war was forced upon us by others. (2) 
Now that the war is here we must act in self-defence. (3) In this war the 
German people are in danger of losing everything. This declaration of our 
Reichstag group is an obvious rehashing of the government declaration. As the 
latter based their claims upon diplomatic negotiations and imperial telegrams, 
so the socialist group points to peace demonstrations of the social democracy 
before the war. Where the crown speech denies all aims of conquest, the 
Reichstag group repudiates a war of conquest by standing upon its socialism. 
And when the emperor and chancellor cry out, “We are fighting for the highest 
principles. We know no parties, we know only Germans,” the social democratic 
declaration echoes: “Our people risk everything. In this hour of danger we will 
not desert our fatherland.”

Only in one point does the social democratic declaration differ from its 
government model: it placed the danger of Russian despotism in the foreground 
of its orientation, as a danger to German freedom. The crown speech says, 
regarding Russia: with a heavy heart I have been forced to mobilise against a 
neighbour with whom I have fought upon so many battlefields. With honest sorrow 
I have seen a friendship faithfully kept by Germany fall to pieces.” The social 
democratic group changed this sorrowful rupture of a true friendship with the 
Russian czar into a fanfare for liberty against despotism, used the 
revolutionary heritage of socialism to give to the war a democratic mantle, a 
popular halo. Here alone the social democratic declaration gives evidence of 
independent thought on the part of our social democrats.

As we have said, all these things came to the social democracy as a sudden 
inspiration on the fourth of August. All that they had said up to this day, 
every declaration that they had made, down to the very eve of the war, was in 
diametrical opposition to the declaration of the Reichstag group. The Vorwärts 
wrote on July 25, when the Austrian ultimatum to Serbia was published: “They 
want the war, the unscrupulous elements that influence and determine the Wiener 
Hofburg. They want the war – it has been ringing out of the wild cries of the 
black-yellow press for weeks. They want the war – the Austrian ultimatum to 
Serbia makes it plain and clear to the world.

``“Because the blood of Franz Ferdinand and his wife flowed under the shots of 
an insane fanatic, shall the blood of thousands of workers and farmers be shed? 
Shall one insane crime be purged by another even more insane? ... The Austrian 
ultimatum may be the torch that will set Europe in flames at all four corners.

“For this ultimatum, in its form and in its demands, is so shameless, that a 
Serbian government that should humbly retreat before this note, would have to 
reckon with the possibility of being driven out by the masses of the people 
between dinner and dessert ....

“It was a crime of the chauvinistic press of Germany to egg on our dear ally to 
the utmost in its desire for war. And beyond a doubt, Herr von Bethmann-Hollweg 
promised Herr Berchtold our support. But Berlin is playing a game as dangerous 
as that being played by Vienna.”``

The Leipziger Volkszeitung wrote on July 24:

``“The Austrian military party has staked everything on one card, for in no 
country in the world has national and military chauvinism anything to lose. In 
Austria chauvinistic circles are particularly bankrupt; their nationalistic 
howls are a frantic attempt to cover up Austria’s economic ruin, the robbery 
and murder of war to fill its coffers ...”``

The Dresden Volkszeitung said, on the same day:

``“Thus far the war maniacs of the Wiener Ballplatz have failed to furnish 
proof that would justify Austria in the demands it has made upon Serbia. So 
long as the Austrian government is not in a position to do this, it places 
itself, by its provocative and insulting attacks upon Serbia, in a false 
position before all Europe. And even if Serbia’s guilt was proven, even if the 
assassination in Sarajevo had actually been prepared under the eyes of the 
Serbian government, the demands made in the note are far in excess of normal 
bounds. Only the most unscrupulous war lust can explain such demands upon 
another state... .”``

The Muenchener Post, on July 25, wrote:

``“This Austrian note is a document unequalled in the history of the last two 
centuries. Upon the findings of an investigation whose contents have, till now, 
been kept from the European public, without court proceedings against the 
murderer of the heir presumptive and his spouse, it makes demands on Serbia, 
the acceptance of which would mean national suicide to Serbia ...”``

The Schleswig-Holstein Volkszeitung declared, on the twenty-fourth of July:

``“Austria is provoking Serbia. Austria-Hungary wants war, and is committing a 
crime that may drown all Europe in blood ... Austria is playing va banque. It 
dares a provocation of the Serbian state that the latter, if it is not entirely 
defenceless, will certainly refuse to tolerate ...

“Every civilized person must protest emphatically against the criminal 
behaviour of the Austrian rulers. It is the duty of the workers above all, and 
of all other human beings who honour peace and civilisation, to try their 
utmost to prevent the consequences of the bloody insanity that has broken out 
in Vienna.”``

The Magdeburger Volksstimme of July 25 said:

``“Any Serbian government that even pretended to consider these demands 
seriously would be swept out in the same hour by the parliament and by the 
people.

“The action of Austria is the more despicable because Berchtold is standing 
before the Serbian government and before Europe with empty hands.

“To precipitate a war such as this at the present time means to invite a world 
war. To act thus shows a desire to disturb the peace of an entire hemisphere. 
One cannot thus make moral conquests, or convince non-participants of one’s own 
righteousness. It can be safely assumed that the press of Europe, and with it 
the European governments, will call the vainglorious and senseless Viennese 
statesmen energetically and unmistakably to order.”``

On July 24 the Frankfurter Volksstimme wrote:

``“Upheld by the agitation of the clerical press, which mourns in Franz 
Ferdinand its best friend and demands that his death be avenged upon the 
Serbian people, upheld by German war patriots whose language becomes daily more 
contemptible and more threatening, the Austrian government has allowed itself 
to be driven to send an ultimatum to Serbia couched in language that, for 
presumptiousness, leaves little to be desired; containing demands whose 
fulfilment by the Serbian government is manifestly impossible.”``

On the same day the Elberfelder Freie Presse wrote:

``“A telegram of the semiofficial Wolff Bureau reports the terms of the demands 
made on Serbia by Austria. From these it may be gathered that the rulers in 
Vienna are pushing toward war with all their might. For the conditions imposed 
by the note that was presented in Belgrade last night are nothing short of a 
protectorate of Austria over Serbia. It is eminently necessary that the 
diplomats of Berlin make the war agitators of Vienna understand that Germany 
will not move a finger to support such outrageous demands, that a withdrawal of 
the threats would be advisable.”``

The Bergische Arbeiterstimme of Solingen writes:

``“Austria demands a conflict with Serbia, and uses the assassination at 
Sarajevo as a pretext for putting Serbia morally in the wrong. But the whole 
matter has been approached too clumsily to influence European public opinion.

“But if the war agitators of the Wiener Ballplatz believe that their allies of 
the Triple Alliance, Germany and Italy, will come to their assistance in a 
conflict in which Russia, too, will be involved, they are suffering from a 
dangerous illusion. Italy would welcome the weakening of Austria-Hungary, its 
rival on the Adriatic and in the Balkans, and would certainly decline to burn 
its fingers to help Austria. In Germany, on the other hand, the powers that be 
– even should they be so foolish as to wish it – would not dare to risk the 
life of a single soldier to satisfy the criminal lust for power of the 
Habsburgers without arousing the fury of the entire people.”``

Thus the entire working-class press, without exception, judged the war’s causes 
a week before its outbreak. Obviously the question was one of neither the 
existence nor the freedom of Germany, but a shameful adventure of the Austrian 
war party; not a question of self-defence, national protection and a holy war 
forced upon us in the name of freedom, but a bold provocation, an abominable 
threat against foreign, Serbian independence and liberty.

What was it that happened on August 4 to turn this clearly defined and so 
unanimously accepted attitude of the social democracy upside down? Only one new 
factor had appeared – the White Book that was presented to the Reichstag by the 
German government on that day. And this contained, on page 4, the following:

``“Under these circumstances Austria must say to itself that it is incompatible 
with the dignity and the safety of the monarchy to remain inactive any longer 
in the face of the occurrences across the border. The Austrian imperial 
government has notified us of this, their attitude, and has begged us to state 
our views. Out of a full heart we could but assure our ally of our agreement 
with this interpretation of conditions and assure him that any action that 
would seem necessary to put an end to Serbian attempts against the existence of 
the Austrian monarchy would meet with our approval. We fully realised that 
eventual war measures undertaken by Austria must bring Russia into the 
situation and that we, in order to carry out our duty as ally, might be driven 
into war. But we could not, realising as we did that the most vital interests 
of Austria-Hungary were threatened, advise our ally to adopt a policy of 
acquiescence, that could not possibly be brought into accord with its dignity, 
nor could we refuse to lend our aid in this attitude.

“And we were particularly prevented from taking this stand by the fact that the 
persistent subversive Serbian agitation seriously jeopardised us. If the 
Serbians had been permitted, with the aid of Russia and France, to continue to 
threaten the existence of the neighbouring monarchy, there would have ensued a 
gradual collapse of Austria and a subjection of all the Slavic races under the 
Russian sceptre, which would have rendered untenable the situation of the 
Germanic race in Central Europe. A morally weakened Austria, succumbing before 
the advance of Russian Pan-Slavism, would no longer be an ally on which we 
could count and depend, as we are obliged to do in view of the increasingly 
menacing attitude of our neighbours to the East and to the West. We therefore 
gave Austria a free hand in her proceedings against Serbia. We have had no 
share in the preparations.”``

These were the words that lay before the social democratic Reichstag group on 
August 4, the only important and determining phrases in the entire White Book, 
a concise declaration of the German government beside which all other yellow, 
grey, blue, orange books on the diplomatic passages that preceded the war and 
its most immediate causes become absolutely irrelevant and insignificant. Here 
the Reichstag group had the key to a correct judgment of the situation in hand. 
The entire social democratic press, a week before, had cried out that the 
Austrian ultimatum was a criminal provocation of the world war and demanded 
preventive and pacific action on the part of the German government. The entire 
socialist press assumed that the Austrian ultimatum had descended upon the 
German government like a bolt from the blue as it had upon the German public.

But now the White Book declared, briefly and clearly:

    That the Austrian government had requested German sanction before taking a 
final step against Serbia.
    That the German government clearly understood that the action undertaken by 
Austria would lead to war with Serbia, and ultimately, to European war.
    That the German government did not advise Austria to give in, but on the 
contrary declared that an acquiescent, weakened Austria could not be regarded 
as a worthy ally of Germany.
    That the German government assured Austria, before it advanced against 
Serbia, of its assistance under all circumstances, in case of war, and finally,
    That the German government, withal, had not reserved for itself control 
over the decisive ultimatum from Austria to Serbia, upon which the whole world 
war depended, but had left to Austria “an absolutely free hand.”

All of this our Reichstag group learned on August 4. And still another fact it 
learned from the government – that German forces already had invaded Belgium. 
And from all this the social democratic group concluded that this is a war of 
defence against foreign invasion, for the existence of the fatherland, for 
“Kultur,” a war for liberty against Russian despotism.

Was the obvious background of the war, and the scenery that so scantily 
concealed it, was the whole diplomatic performance that was acted out at the 
outbreak of the war, with its clamour about a world of enemies, all threatening 
the life of Germany, all moved the one desire to weaken, to humiliate, to 
subjugate the German people and nation – were all these things such a complete 
surprise? Did these factors actually call for more judgment, more critical 
sagacity than they possessed? Nowhere was this less true than of our party. It 
had already gone through two great German wars, and in both of them had 
received memorable lessons.

Even a poorly informed student of history knows that the war of 1866 against 
Austria was systematically prepared by Bismarck long before it broke out, and 
that his policies, from the very beginning, led inevitably to a rupture and to 
war with Austria. The crown prince himself, later Emperor Frederick, in his 
memoirs under the date of November 14 of that year, speaks of this purpose of 
the chancellor:

``“He (Bismarck), when he went into office, was firmly resolved to bring 
Prussia to a war with Austria, but was very careful not to betray this purpose, 
either at that time or on any other premature occasion to His Majesty, until 
the time seemed favourable.”

“Compare with this confession,” says Auer in his brochure Die Sedanfeier und 
die Sozialdemokratie “the proclamation that King William sent out ‘to my 
people’.

    “The fatherland is in danger! Austria and a large part of Germany have 
risen in arms against us.

    “It is only a few years ago since I, of my own free will, without thinking 
of former misunderstandings, held out a fraternal hand to Austria in order to 
save a German nation from foreign domination. But my hopes have been blasted. 
Austria cannot forget that its lords once ruled Germany; it refuses to see in 
the younger, more virile Prussia an ally, but persists in regarding it as a 
dangerous rival. Prussia – so it believes – must be opposed in all its aims, 
because whatever favours Prussia harms Austria. The old unholy jealousy has 
again broken out; Prussia is to be weakened, destroyed, dishonoured. All 
treaties with Prussia are void, German lords are not only called upon, but 
persuaded, to sever their alliance with Prussia. Wherever we look in Germany, 
we are surrounded by enemies whose war cry is – Down with Prussia!”``

Praying for the blessings of heaven, King William ordered a general day of 
prayer and penance for the eighteenth of July, saying: “It has not pleased God 
to crown with success my attempts to preserve the blessings of peace for my 
people.”

Should not the official accompaniment to the outbreak of the war on August 4 
have awakened in the minds of our group vivid memories of long remembered words 
and melodies? Had they completely forgotten their party history?

But not enough! In the year 1870 there came the war with France, and history 
has united its outbreak with an unforgettable occurrence: the Ems dispatch, a 
document that has become a classic byword for capitalist government art in war 
making, and which marks a memorable episode in our party history. Was it not 
old Liebknecht, was it not the German social democracy who felt in duty bound, 
at that time, to disclose these facts and to show to the masses “how wars are 
made”?

Making war simply and solely for the protection of the fatherland was, by the 
way, not Bismarck’s invention. He only carried out, with characteristic 
unscrupulousness, an old, well-known and truly international recipe of 
capitalist statesmanship. When and where has there been a war since so-called 
public opinion has played a role in governmental calculations, in which each 
and every belligerent party did not, with a heavy heart, draw the sword from 
its sheath for the single and sole purpose of defending its fatherland and its 
own righteous cause from the shameful attacks of the enemy? This legend is as 
inextricably a part of the game of war as powder and lead. The game is old. 
Only that the Social Democratic Party could play it is new.



Chapter 3

Our party should have been prepared to recognise the real aims of this war, to 
meet it without surprise, to judge it by its deeper relationship according to 
their wide political experience. The events and forces that led to August 4, 
1914, were no secrets. The world had been preparing for decades, in broad 
daylight, in the widest publicity, step by step, and hour by hour, for the 
world war. And if today a number of socialists threaten with horrible 
destruction the “secret diplomacy” that has brewed this devilry behind the 
scenes, they are ascribing to these poor wretches a magic power that they 
little deserve, just as the Botokude whips his fetish for the outbreak of a 
storm. The so-called captains of nations are, in this war, as at all times, 
merely chessmen, moved by all-powerful historic events and forces, on the 
surface of capitalist society. If ever there were persons capable of 
understanding these events and occurrences, it was the members of the German 
social democracy.

Two lines of development in recent history lead straight to the present war. 
One has its origin in the period when the so-called national states, i.e., the 
modern states, were first constituted, from the time of the Bismarckian war 
against France. The war of 1870, which, by the annexation of Alsace-Lorraine, 
threw the French republic into the arms of Russia, split Europe into two 
opposing camps and opened up a period of insane competitive armament, first 
piled up the firebrands for the present world conflagration.

Bismarck’s troops were still stationed in France when Marx wrote to the 
Braunschweiger Ausschuss:

``“He who is not deafened by the momentary clamour, and is not interested in 
deafening the German people, must see that the war of 1870 carries with it, of 
necessity, a war between Germany and Russia, just as the war of 1866 bore the 
war of 1870. 1 say of necessity, unless the unlikely should happen, unless a 
revolution breaks out in Russia before that time If this does not occur, a war 
between Germany and Russia may even now be regarded as un fait accompli. It 
depends entirely upon the attitude of the German victor to determine whether 
this war has been useful or dangerous. If they take Alsace-Lorraine, then 
France with Russia will arm against Germany. It is superfluous to point out the 
disastrous consequences.”``

At that time this prophecy was laughed down. The bonds which united Russia and 
Prussia seemed so strong that it was considered madness to believe in a union 
of autocratic Russia with republican France. Those who supported this 
conception were laughed at as madmen. And yet everything that Marx has 
prophesied has happened, to the last letter. “For that is,” says Auer in his 
Sedanfeier, “social democratic politics, seeing things clearly as they are, and 
differing therein from the day-by-day politics of the others, bowing blindly 
down before every momentary success.”

This must not be misunderstood to mean that the desire for revenge for the 
robbery accomplished by Bismarck has driven the French into a war with Germany, 
that the kernel of the present war is to be found in the much discussed 
“revenge for Alsace-Lorraine.” This is the convenient nationalist legend of the 
German war agitator, who creates fables of a darkly-brooding France that 
“cannot forget” its defeat, just as the Bismarckian press-servants ranted of 
the dethroned Princess Austria who could not forget her erstwhile superiority 
over the charming Cinderella Prussia. As a matter of fact revenge for 
Alsace-Lorraine has become the theatrical property of a couple of patriotic 
clowns, the “Lion de Belfort” nothing more than an ancient survival.

The annexation of Alsace-Lorraine long ago ceased to play a role in French 
politics, being superseded by new, more pressing cares; and neither the 
government nor any serious party in France thought of a war with Germany 
because of these territories. If, nevertheless, the Bismarck heritage has 
become the firebrand that started this world conflagration, it is rather in the 
sense of having driven Germany on the one hand, and France, and with it all of 
Europe, on the other, along the downward path of military competition, of 
having brought about the Franco-Russian alliance, of having united Austria with 
Germany as an inevitable consequence. This gave to Russian czarism a tremendous 
prestige as a factor in European politics. Germany and France have 
systematically fawned before Russia for her favour. At that time the links were 
forged that united Germany with Austria-Hungary, whose strength, as the words 
quoted from the White Book show, lie in their “brotherhood in arms,” in the 
present war.

Thus the war of 1870 brought in its wake the outward political grouping of 
Europe about the axes of the Franco-German antagonism, and established the rule 
of militarism in the lives of the European peoples. Historical development has 
given to this ride and to this grouping an entirely new content. The second 
line that leads to the present world war, and which again brilliantly justifies 
Marx’s prophecy, has its origin in international occurrences that Marx did not 
live to see, in the imperialist development of the last twenty-five years.

The growth of capitalism, spreading out rapidly over a reconstituted Europe 
after the war period of the sixties and seventies, particularly after the long 
period of depression that followed the inflation and the panic of the year 
1873, reaching an unnatural zenith in the prosperity of the nineties opened up 
a new period of storm and danger among the nations of Europe. They were 
competing in their expansion toward the non-capitalist countries and zones of 
the world. As early as the eighties a strong tendency toward colonial expansion 
became apparent. England secured control of Egypt and created for itself, in 
South Africa, a powerful colonial empire, France took possession of Tunis in 
North Africa and Tonkin in East Asia; Italy gained a foothold in Abyssinia; 
Russia accomplished its conquests in Central Asia and pushed forward into 
Manchuria; Germany won its first colonies in Africa and in the South Sea, and 
the United States joined the circle when it procured the Philippines with 
“interests” in Eastern Asia. Ibis period of feverish conquests has brought on, 
beginning with the Chinese-Japanese War in 1895, a practically uninterrupted 
chain of bloody wars, reaching its height in the Great Chinese Invasion, and 
closing with the Russo-Japanese War of 1904.

All these occurrences, coming blow upon blow, created new, extra-European 
antagonisms on all sides: between Italy and France in Northern Africa, between 
France and England in Egypt, between England and Russia in Central Asia, 
between Russia and Japan in Eastern Asia, between Japan and England in China, 
between the United States and Japan in the Pacific Ocean – a very restless 
ocean, full of sharp conflicts and temporary alliances, of tension and 
relaxation, threatening every few years to break out into a war between 
European powers. It was clear to everybody, therefore, (1) that the secret 
underhand war of each capitalist nation against every other, on the backs of 
Asiatic and African peoples must sooner or later lead to a general reckoning, 
that the wind that was sown in Africa and Asia would return to Europe as a 
terrific storm, the more certainly since increased armament of the European 
states was the constant associate of these Asiatic and African occurrences; (2) 
that the European world war would have to come to an outbreak as soon as the 
partial and changing conflicts between the imperialist states found a 
centralised axis, a conflict of sufficient magnitude to group them, for the 
time being, into large, opposing factions. This situation was created by the 
appearance of German imperialism.

In Germany one may study the development of Imperialism, crowded as it was into 
the shortest possible space of time, in concrete form. The unprecedented 
rapidity of German industrial and commercial development since the foundation 
of the empire brought out during the eighties two characteristically peculiar 
forms of capitalist accumulation: the most pronounced growth of monopoly in 
Europe and the best developed and most concentrated banking system in the whole 
world. The monopolies have organised the steel and iron industry, i.e., the 
branch of capitalist endeavour most interested in government orders, in 
militaristic equipment and in imperialistic undertakings (railroad building, 
the exploitation of mines, etc.) into the most influential factor in the 
nation. The latter has cemented the money interests into a firmly organised 
whole, with the greatest, most virile energy, creating a power that 
autocratically rules the industry, commerce and credit of the nation, dominant 
in private as well as public affairs, boundless in its powers of expansion, 
ever hungry for profit and activity, impersonal, and therefore, liberal-minded, 
reckless and unscrupulous, international by its very nature, ordained by its 
capacities to use the world as its stage.

Germany is under a personal regime, with strong initiative and spasmodic 
activity, with the weakest kind of parliamentarism, incapable of opposition, 
uniting all capitalist strata in the sharpest opposition to the working class. 
It is obvious that this live, unhampered imperialism, coming upon the world 
stage at a time when the world was practically divided up, with gigantic 
appetites, soon became an irresponsible factor of general unrest.

This was already foreshadowed by the radical upheaval that took place in the 
military policies of the empire at the end of the nineties. At that time two 
naval budgets were introduced which doubled the naval power of Germany and 
provided for a naval program covering almost two decades. This meant a sweeping 
change in the financial and trade policy of the nation. In the first place, it 
involved a striking change in the foreign policy of the empire. The policy of 
Bismarck was founded upon the principle that the empire is and must remain a 
land power, that the German fleet, at best, is but a very dispensable requisite 
for coastal defence. Even the secretary of state, Hollmann, declared in March 
1897, in the Budget Commission of the Reichstag: “We need no navy for coastal 
defence. Our coasts protect themselves.”

With the two naval bills an entirely new program was promulgated: on land and 
sea, Germany first This marks the change from Bismarckian continental policies 
to Weltpolitik, from the defensive to the offensive as the end and aim of 
Germany’s military program. The language of these facts was so unmistakable 
that the Reichstag itself furnished the necessary commentary. Lieber, the 
leader of the Center at that time, spoke on the eleventh of March, 1896, after 
a famous speech of the emperor on the occasion of the twenty-fifth anniversary 
of the founding of the German empire, which had developed the new program as a 
forerunner to the naval bills, In which he mentioned “shoreless naval planer 
against which Germany must be prepared to enter Into active opposition. Another 
Center leader, Schadler, cried out in the Reichstag on March 23, 1898, when the 
first naval bill was under discussion, “The nation believes that we cannot be 
first on land and first on sea. You answer, gentlemen, that is not what we 
want! Nevertheless, gentlemen, you are at the beginning of such a conception, 
at a very strong beginning.”

When the second bill came, the same Schadler declared in the Reichstag on the 
fifth of February, 1900, referring to previous promises that there would be no 
further naval bills, “and today comes this bill, which means nothing more and 
nothing less than the inauguration of a world fleet, as a basis of support for 
world policies, by doubling our navy and binding the next two decades by our 
demands.” As a matter of fact the government openly defended the political 
program of its new course of action. On December 11, 1899, von Bülow, at that 
time state secretary of the foreign office, in a defence of the second naval 
bill stated,

``“When the English speak of ‘a greater Britain,’ when the French talk of ‘The 
New France,’ when the Russians open up Asia for themselves, we too have a right 
to aspire to a greater Germany. If we do not create a navy sufficient to 
protect our trade, our natives in foreign lands, our missions and the safety of 
our shores, we are threatening the most vital interests of our nation. In the 
coming century the German people will be either the hammer or the anvil.”``

Strip this of its coastal defence ornamentation, and there remains the colossal 
program: greater Germany, as the hammer upon other nations.

It is not difficult to determine the direction toward which these provocations, 
in the main, were directed. Germany was to become the rival of the world’s 
great naval force – England. And England did not fail to understand. The naval 
reform bills, and the speeches that ushered them in, created a lively unrest in 
England, an unrest that has never again subsided. In March 1910, Lord Robert 
Cecil said in the House of Commons during a naval debate: “I challenge any man 
to give me a plausible reason for the tremendous navy that Germany is building 
up, other than to take up the fight against England.” The fight for supremacy 
on the ocean that lasted for one and a half decades on both sides and 
culminated in the feverish building of dreadnoughts and superdreadnoughts, was, 
in effect, the war between Germany and England. The naval bill of December 11, 
1899, was a declaration of war by Germany, which England answered on August 4, 
1914.

It should be noted that this fight for naval supremacy had nothing in common 
with the economic rivalry for the world market. The English “monopoly of the 
world market” which ostensibly hampered German industrial development, so much 
discussed at the present time, really belongs to the sphere of those war 
legends of which the ever green French “revenge” is the most useful. This 
“monopoly” had become an old time fairy tale, to the lasting regret of the 
English capitalists. The industrial development of France, Belgium, Italy, 
Russia, India and Japan, and above all, of Germany and America, had put an end 
to this monopoly of the first half of the nineteenth century. Side by side with 
England, one nation after another stepped into the world market, capitalism 
developed automatically, and with gigantic strides, into world economy.

English supremacy on the sea, which has robbed so many social democrats of 
their peaceful sleep, and which, it seems to these gentlemen, must be destroyed 
to preserve international socialism, had, up to this time, disturbed German 
capitalism so little that the latter was able to grow up into a lusty youth, 
with bursting cheeks, under its “yoke.” Yes, England itself, and its colonies, 
were the cornerstones for German industrial growth. And similarly, Germany 
became, for the English nation, its most important and most necessary customer. 
Far from standing in each other’s way, British and German capitalist 
development were mutually highly interdependent, and united by a far-reaching 
system of division of labour, strongly augmented by England’s free trade 
policy. German trade and its interests in the world market, therefore, had 
nothing whatever to do with a change of front in German politics and with the 
building of its fleet.

Nor did German colonial possessions at that time come into conflict with the 
English control of the seas. German colonies were not in need of protection by 
a first-class sea power. No one, certainly not England, envied Germany her 
possessions. That they were taken during the war by England and Japan, that the 
booty had changed owners, is but a generally accepted war measure, just as 
German imperialist appetites clamour for Belgium, a desire that no man outside 
of an insane asylum would have dared to express in time of peace. South-East 
and South-West Africa, Wilhelmsland or Tsingtau would never have caused any 
war, by land or by sea, between Germany and England. In fact, just before the 
war broke out, a treaty regulating a peaceable division of the Portuguese 
colonies in Africa between these two nations had been practically completed.

When Germany unfolded its banner of naval power and world policies it announced 
the desire for new and far-reaching conquest in the world by German 
imperialism. By means of a first-class aggressive navy, and by military forces 
that increased in a parallel ratio, the apparatus for a future policy was 
established, opening wide the doors for unprecedented possibilities. Naval 
building and military armaments became the glorious business of German 
industry, opening up a boundless prospect for further operations by trust and 
bank capital in the whole wide world. Thus, the acquiescence of all capitalist 
parties and their rallying under the flag of imperialism was assured. The 
Center followed the example of the National Liberals, the staunchest defenders 
of the steel and iron industry, and, by adopting the naval bill it had loudly 
denounced in 1900, became the party of the government. The Progressives trotted 
after the Center when the successor to the naval bill – the high-tariff party – 
came up; while the Junkers, the staunchest opponents of the “horrid navy” and 
of the canal brought up the rear as the most enthusiastic porkers and parasites 
of the very policy of sea-militarism and colonial robbery they had so 
vehemently opposed. The Reichstag election of 1907, the so-called Hottentot 
Elections, found the whole of Germany in a paroxysm of imperialistic 
enthusiasm, firmly united under one flag, that of the Germany of von Buelow, 
the Germany that felt itself ordained to play the role of the hammer in the 
world. These elections, with their spiritual pogrom atmosphere, were a prelude 
to the Germany of August 4, a challenge not only to the German working class, 
but to other capitalist nations as well, a challenge directed to no one in 
particular, a mailed fist shaken in the face of the entire world ...




Chapter 4

Turkey became the most important field of operations of German imperialism; the 
Deutsche Bank, with its enormous Asiatic buSiness interests, about which all 
German oriental policies centre, became its peacemaker. In the 50’s and 60’s 
Asiatic Turkey worked chiefly with English capital, which built the railroad 
from Smyrna and leased the first stretch of the Anatolian railroad, up to 
Ismit. In 1888 German capital appeared upon the scene and procured from Abdul 
Hamid the control of the railroad that English capital had built and the 
franchise for the new stretch from Ismit to Angora and branch lines to Scutari, 
Bursa, Konya and Kaizarili. In 1899 the Deutsche Bank secured concessions for 
the building and operation of a harbour and improvements in Hardar Pasha, and 
the sole control over trade and tariff collections in the harbour. In 1901 the 
Turkish Government turned over to the Deutsche Bank the concession for the 
Great Baghdad railroad[1] to the Persian Gulf, in 1907 for the drainage of the 
Sea of Karaviran and the irrigation of the Koma plain.

The reverse of this wonderful work of “peaceful culture” is the “peaceful” and 
wholesale ruin of the farming population of Asia Minor. The cost of this 
tremendous undertaking was advanced, of course, by the Deutsche Bank on the 
security of a widely diversified system of public indebtedness. Turkey will be, 
to all eternity, the debtor of Messrs. Siemens, Gwinner, Helfferich, etc., as 
it was formerly that of English, French and Austrian capital. This debtor, now, 
was forced not only to squeeze enormous sums out of the state to pay the 
interest on these loans, but, in addition, to guarantee a net income upon the 
railway, thus built. The most modern methods of transportation were grafted 
upon a primitive, in many cases purely agricultural, population. From the 
unfruitful soil of farming sections that had been exploited unscrupulously, for 
years, by an oriental despotism, producing scarcely enough to feed the 
population after the huge state debts had been paid, it is practically 
impossible to secure the profits demanded by the railroads. Freight and 
travelling are exceedingly undeveloped, since the industrial and cultural 
character of the region is most primitive, and can improve only at a slow rate. 
The deficit that must be paid to raise the required profit is, therefore, paid 
by the Turkish Government in the form of a so-called kilometer guarantee. 
European Turkey was built up according to this system by Austrian and French 
capital, and the same system has been adopted by the Deutsche Bank in its 
operations in Asiatic Turkey. As bond and surety that the subsidy will be paid, 
the Turkish Government has handed over to the representatives of European 
capital, the so-called Executive Board in control of public debt, the main 
source of Turkish national income, which has given to the Deutsche Bank the 
right to collect the tithe from a number of provinces. In this way, for 
instance, the Turkish Government paid, from 1893 to 1910, for the railroad to 
Angora and for the line from Eskishehir to Konya, a subsidy of about 9,090,000 
francs. The tithes thus leased by the Turkish Government to its European 
creditors are ancient payments rendered in produce such as corn, sheep, silk, 
etc. They are not collected directly but through sub-lessees, somewhat similar 
to the famous tax-collectors, so notorious in pre-revolutionary France, the 
state selling the right to raise the amount required from each vilayet 
(province) by auction, against cash payment. When the speculator or company has 
thus procured the right to collect the tithe of a vilayet, it, in turn, sells 
the tithe of each individual sanjak (district) to other speculators, who again 
divide their portion among a veritable band of smaller agents. Since each one 
or these collectors must not only cover his own expenses but secure as large a 
profit as possible besides, the tithe grows like a landslide as it approaches 
the fanner, if the lessee has been mistaken in his calculation, he seeks to 
recompense himself at the expense of the farmer. The latter, practically always 
in debt, waits impatiently for the time when he can sell his crop. But after 
his grain is cut he must frequently wait for weeks before the tithe collector 
comes to take his portion. The collector, who is usually graindealer as well, 
exploits this need of the farmer whose crop threatens to rot in the field, and 
persuades him to sell at a reduced price, knowing full well that it will be 
easy to secure the assistance of public officials and particularly of the 
muktar (town mayor) against the dissatisfied. When no tax-collector can be 
found the government itself collects the tithe in produce, puts it into storage 
houses and turns it over as part payment to the capitalists. This is the inner 
mechanism of the “industrial regeneration of Turkey” by European capital.

Thus a twofold purpose is accomplished. The farming population of Asia Minor 
becomes the object of a well organized process of exploitation in the interest 
of European, in this case German, financial and industrial capital. This again 
promotes the growth of the German sphere of interest in Turkey and lays the 
foundation for Turkey’s “political protection.” At the same time the instrument 
that carries out the exploitation of the farming population, the Turkish 
Government, becomes the willing tool and vassal of Germany’s foreign policies. 
For many years Turkish finance, tariff policies, taxation and state 
expenditures have been under European control. German influence has made itself 
particularly felt in the Turkish military organization.

It is obvious from the foregoing, that the interests of German imperialism 
demand the protection of the Turkish State, to the extent at least of 
preventing its complete disintegration. The liquidation of Turkey would mean 
its division between England, Russia, Italy, and Greece among others and the 
basis for a large-scale operation by German capital would vanish. Moreover, an 
extraordinary increase in the power of Russia, England and the Mediterranean 
States would result. For German imperialism, therefore, the preservation of 
this accommodating apparatus of the “independent Turkish State,” the 
“integrity” of Turkey is a matter of necessity. And this necessity will exist 
until such time as this state will fall, having been consumed from within by 
German capital, as was Egypt by England and more recently Morocco by France, 
into the lap of Germany. The well-known spokesman of German imperialism, Paul 
Rohrbach, expressed this candidly and honestly when he said:

``“In the very nature of things Turkey, surrounded on all sides by envious 
neighbours, must seek the support of a power that has practically no 
territorial interests in the Orient. That power is Germany. We, on the other 
hand, would be at a disadvantage if Turkey should disappear. If Russia and 
England fall heir to the Turkish state, obviously it will mean to both of these 
states a considerable increase in power. But even if Turkey should be so 
divided that we should also secure an extensive portion, it would mean for us 
endless difficulties. Russia, England, and In a certain sense France and Italy 
as well. are neighbours of present Turkish possessions and are in a position to 
hold and defend their portion by land and by sea. But we have no direct 
connection with the Orient. A German Asia Minor or Mesopotamia can become a 
reality only if Russia, and in consequence Prance as well, should be forced to 
relinquish their present political aims and ideals, i.e., if the world war 
should take a decisive turn in favour of German interests.” (The War and German 
Policy, p.36).``

Germany swore solemnly on November 8th, 1898, in Damascus, by the shade of the 
great Saladin, to protect and to preserve the Mohammedan world and the green 
flag of the Prophet, and in so doing strengthened the regime of the bloody 
Sultan Abdul Hamid for over a decade, It has been able, after a short period of 
enstrangement, to exert the same influence upon the Young Turk regime.[2] Aside 
from conducting the profitable business of the Deutsche Bank, the German 
mission busied itself chiefly with the reorganization and training of Turkish 
militarism, under German instructors with von der Goltz Pasha at the head. The 
modernization of the army, of course, piled new burdens upon the Turkish 
farmers, but it was a splendid business arrangement for Krupp and the Deutsche 
Bank. At the same time Turkish militarism became entirely dependent upon 
Prussian militarism, and became the centre of German ambitions in the 
Mediterranean and in Asia Minor.

That this “regeneration” of Turkey is a purely artificial attempt to galvanize 
a corpse, the fate of the Turkish revolutions best shows. In the first stage, 
while ideal considerations still predominated in the Young Turkish movement, 
when it was still fired with ambitious plans and illusions of a real springtime 
of life and of a rejuvenation for Turkey, its political sympathies were 
decidedly in favour of England. This country seemed to them to represent the 
ideal state of modern liberal rule, while Germany, which has so long played the 
role of protector of the holy regime of the old Sultan was felt to be its 
natural opponent. For a while it seemed as if the revolution of 1908 would mean 
the bankruptcy of German oriental policies. It seemed certain that the 
overthrow of Abdul Hamid would go hand in hand with the downfall of German 
influence. As the Young Turks assumed power, however, and showed their complete 
inability to carry out any modern industrial, social or national reform on a 
large scale, as the counterrevolutionary hoof became more and more apparent, 
they turned of necessity to the tried and proven methods of Abdul Hamid, which 
meant periodic bloody massacres of oppressed peoples, goaded on until they flew 
at each other’s throats, boundless, truly oriental exploitation of the farming 
population became the foundation of the nation. The artificial restoration of 
rule by force again became the most important consideration for “Young Turkey” 
and the traditional alliance of Abdul Hamid with Germany was re-established as 
the deciding factor in the foreign policy of Turkey.

The multiplicity of national problems that threaten to disrupt the Turkish 
nation make its regeneration a hopeless undertaking. The Armenian, Kurdian, 
Syrian, Arabian, Greek, and (up to the most recent times) the Albanian and 
Macedonian questions, the manifold economic and social problems that exist in 
the different parts of the realm, are a serious menace. The growth of a strong, 
a hopeful, capitalism in the neighbouring Balkan states and the long years of 
destructive activity of international capital and international diplomacy stamp 
every attempt to hold together this rotting pile of timber as nothing but a 
reactionary undertaking. This has long been apparent, particularly to the 
German Social Democracy. As early as 1896, at the time of the Cretan 
uprising,[3] the German Party press was filled with long discussions on the 
Oriental problem, that led to a revision of the attitude taken by Marx at the 
time of the Crimean War[4] and to definite repudiation of the “integrity of 
Turkey” as a heritage of European reaction. Nowhere was the Young Turkish 
regime, its inner sterility and its counter-revolutionary character, so quickly 
and so thoroughly recognized as in the German Social Democratic press. It was a 
real Prussian idea, this building of strategic railroads for rapid 
mobilization, this sending of capable military instructors to prop up the 
crumbling edifice of the Turkish state.

In 1912 the Young Turkish regiment was forced to abdicate to the 
counter-revolution. Characteristically, the first act of “Turkish regeneration” 
in this war was a coup d’etat, the annihilation of the constitution. In this 
respect too there was a formal return to the rule of Abdul Hamid.

The first Balkan war[5] brought bankruptcy to Turkish militarism, in spite of 
German training. And the present war, into which Turkey was precipitated as 
Germany’s “charge,” will lead, with inevitable fatality, to the further or to 
the final liquidation of the Turkish Empire.

The position of German militarism – and its essence, the interests of the 
Deutsche Bank – has brought the German Empire in the Orient into opposition to 
all other nations. Above all to England. The latter had not only rival business 
relations and fat profits in Mesopotamia and Anatolia which were forced to 
retreat before their German rivals. This was a situation that English 
capitalism grudgingly accepted. But the building of strategic I railroad, and 
the strengthening of Turkish militarism under German influence was felt by 
England to be a sore point, in a strategic question of its world political 
relations; lying as it did at the cross roads between Central Asia, Persia and 
India, on the one side, and Egypt on the other.

``“England,” writes Rohrbach in his Baghdadbahn, “can be attacked and mortally 
wounded on land in Egypt. The loss of Egypt will mean to England not only the 
loss of control over the Suez Canal and its connections with India and Asia, 
but probably the sacrifice of its possessions in Central and Eastern Africa as 
well. A Mohammedan power like Turkey, moreover could exercise a dangerous 
influence over the 60 millions of Mohammedan subjects of England in India, in 
Afghanistan and Persia, should Turkey conquer Egypt. But Turkey can subjugate 
Egypt only if it possesses an extended system of railroads in Asia Minor and 
Syria, if by an extension of the Anatolian Railway it is able to ward off an 
English attack upon Mesopotamia, if it increases and improves its army, if its 
general economic and financial conditions are improved.”

And in his The War and German Policy, which was published after the outbreak of 
the war, he says:

``“The Baghdad Railroad was destined from the start to bring Constantinople and 
the military strongholds of the Turkish Empire in Asia Minor into direct 
connection with Syria and the provinces on the Euphrates and on the Tigris. Of 
course it was to be foreseen that this railway, together with the projected 
and, partly or wholly, completed railroads in Syria and Arabia, would make it 
possible to use Turkish troops in the direction of Egypt. No one will deny 
that, should the Turkish-German alliance remain in force, and under a number of 
other important conditions whose realization will be even more difficult than 
this alliance, the Baghdad railway is a political life insurance policy for 
Germany.”``

Thus the semi-official spokesman of German imperialism openly revealed its plan 
and its aims in the Orient. Here German policies were clearly marked out, and 
an aggressive fundamental tendency most dangerous for the existing balance of 
world power, with a clearly defined point against England, was disclosed. 
German oriental policies became the concrete commentary to the naval policy 
inaugurated in 1899.

With its programme for Turkish integrity, Germany came into conflict with the 
Balkan states, whose historic completion and inner growth are dependent upon 
the liquidation of European Turkey. It came into conflict with Italy, finally, 
whose imperialistic appetite was likewise longing for Turkish possessions. At 
the Morocco Conference at Algeciras[6] in 1905, Italy already sided with 
England and France. Six years later the Italian expedition to Tripoli,[7] which 
followed the Austrian annexation of Bosnia and gave the signal for the Balkan 
War, already indicated a withdrawal of Italy, foreshadowed the disruption of 
the Triple Alliance[8] and the isolation of German policies on this side as 
well. The other tendency of German expansionist desires in the West became 
evident in the Morocco affair.[9] Nowhere was the negation of the Bismarck 
policy in Germany more clearly shown. Bismarck, as is well known, supported the 
colonial aspirations of France in order to distract its attention from 
Alsace-Lorraine. The new course of Germany, on the other hand, ran exactly 
counter to French colonial expansion. Conditions in Morocco were quite 
different from those that prevailed in Asiatic Turkey. Germany had few 
legitimate interests in Morocco. To be sure, German imperialists puffed up the 
claims of the German firm of Mannesmann, which had made a loan to the Moroccan 
Sultan and demanded mining concessions in return, into a national issue. But 
the well known fact that both of these rival groups in Morocco, the Mannesmann 
as well as the Krupp-Schneider Company are a thoroughly international mixture 
of German, French and Spanish capitalists, prevents anyone from seriously 
speaking of a German sphere of interest. The more symptomatic was the 
determination and the decisiveness with which the German Empire, in 1905, 
suddenly announced its claim to participation in the regulation of Moroccan 
affairs, and protested against French rule in Morocco. This was the first 
world-political clash with France. In 1895 Germany, together with France and 
Russia, assumed a threatening attitude toward victorious Japan to prevent it 
from exploiting its victory over China at Shimonoseki.[10] Five years later it 
went arm in arm with France all along the line on a plundering expedition 
against China. Morocco caused a radical reorientation in Germany’s relations 
with France. The Morocco crisis which in seven years of its duration, twice 
brought Europe to the verge of war between France and Germany, was not a 
question of “revenge” for continental conflicts between the two nations. An 
entirely new conflict had arisen, German imperialism had come into competition 
with that of France. In the end, Germany was satisfied with the French Congo 
region, and in accepting this admitted that it had no special interests to 
protect in Morocco itself. This very fact gave to the German attack in Morocco 
a far reaching political significance. The very indefinitiveness of its 
tangible aims and demands betrayed its insatiable appetite, the seeking and 
feeling for prey – it was a general imperialistic declaration of war against 
France. The contrast between the two nations here was brought into the 
limelight. On the one hand, a slow industrial development, a stagnant 
population, a nation living on its investments, concerned chiefly with foreign 
financial business, burdened with a large number of colonial possessions that 
it could hold together only with the utmost difficulty. On the other hand, a 
mighty young giant, a capitalism forging toward the first place among nations, 
going out into the world to hunt for colonies. English colonies were out of the 
question. So the hunger of German imperialism, besides feeding on Asiatic 
Turkey, turned at once to the French heritage. The French colonies moreover 
wore a convenient bait with which Italy might eventually be attracted and 
repaid for Austrian desires of expansion on the Balkan peninsula, and be thus 
more firmly welded into the Triple Alliance by mutual business interests. The 
demands Germany made upon French imperialism were exceedingly disturbing, 
especially when it is remembered that Germany, once it had taken a foothold in 
any part of Morocco, could at any time set fire to the entire French North 
African possessions, whose inhabitants were in a chronic state of incipient 
warfare with the French conquerors, by supplying them with ammunition. 
Germany’s final withdrawal for suitable compensation did away with this 
immediate danger. But they could not allay the general disturbance in France 
and the world-political conflict that had been created.

Its Morocco policy not only brought Germany into conflict with France but with 
England as well. Here in Morocco, in the immediate neighbourhood of Gibraltar, 
the second important centre of world-political interests of the British 
Government, the sudden appearance of German imperialism with its demands, and 
the drastic impressiveness with which these demands were supported, were 
regarded as a demonstration against England as well. Furthermore the first 
formal protest of 1911 was directed specifically against the agreement of 1904 
between England and France concerning Egypt and Morocco.[11] Germany insisted 
briefly and definitely that England be disregarded in all further regulations 
of Moroccan affairs. The effect that such a demand was certain to have on 
German-English relations is obvious. The situation was commented upon in the 
Frankfurter Zeitung of November 8, 1911, by a London correspondent:

``“This is the outcome: a million negroes in Congo, a great Katzenjammer[12] 
and a furious resentment against perfides Albion.[13] The Katzenjammer Germany 
will live down. But what is to become of our relations with England? As they 
stand today matters are untenable. According to every historic probability they 
will either lead to something worse, that is war, or they will have to be 
speedily patched up ... The trip of the Panther was, as a Berlin correspondent 
said so well in the Frankfurter Zeitung the other day, a dig into the ribs of 
France to show that Germany is still here ... Concerning the effect that this 
event would create here, Berlin cannot possibly entertain the slightest doubt. 
Certainly no correspondent in London was for a moment in doubt that England 
would stand energetically on the side of France. How can the Norddeutsche 
Allgemeine Zeitung still insist that Germany must treat with France alone? For 
several hundred years Europe has been the scene of a steadily increasing 
interweaving of political interests. The misfortune of one, according to the 
laws of politics, fills some with joy, others with apprehension. When two years 
ago Austria had its difficulties with Russia, Germany appeared upon the scene 
with shimmering armour, although Vienna, as was afterwards stated, would have 
preferred to settle matters without German intervention. It is very unlikely 
that England, having just emerged from a period of anti-German feeling, should 
consider that our dealings with France are none of its business. In the last 
analysis, it was a question of might; for a dig in the ribs, be it ever so 
friendly, it is a very tangible matter. For no one can be quite sure when a 
blow on the teeth may follow. Since then the situation has become less 
critical. At the moment when Lloyd George spoke, the danger of a war between 
Germany and England was acute. Are we justified in expecting a different 
attitude from Sir Edward Grey after the policies that he and his followers have 
been pursuing? If Berlin entertained such ideas then it seems to me that the 
German foreign policies have been weighed and found wanting.”``

Thus did our imperialistic policies create sharp conflicts in Asia Minor and 
Morocco, between England and Germany, between Germany and France. But what of 
German relations with Russia? In the murderous spirit that took possession of 
the German public during the first weeks of the war everything seemed credible. 
The German pdpulace believed that Belgian women had gouged out the eyes of the 
German wounded, that Cossacks ate tallow candles, that they had taken infants 
by the legs and torn them to pieces; they believed that Russia aspired to the 
annexation of the German Empire, to the destruction of German “Kultur,” to the 
introduction of absolutism from Kiel to Munich, from the Warthe to the Rhine. 
The Social Democratic Chemnitzer Volksstimme wrote on August 2nd:

``“At this moment we all feel it our duty to fight first against the Russian 
knout. German women and children shall not become the victims of Russian 
bestiality, German territory must not fall into the hands of the Cossacks. For 
if the Entente is victorious, not the French Republicans, but the Russian Czar 
will rule over Germany. In this moment we defend everything that we possess of 
German culture and German freedom against a pitiless and barbarous foe.”``

On the same day the Fränkische Tagespost cried out:

``“Shall the Cossacks, who have already taken possession of our border towns, 
in their onrush on our country, bring destruction to our cities? Shall the 
Russian Czar, whose love of peace the Social Democrats refused to trust even on 
the day when his peace manifesto was published, who is the worst enemy of the 
Russian people themselves, rule over one man of German blood?”``

And the Königsberger Volkzeitung wrote on August 3rd:

``“Not one of us can doubt, whether he is liable for military service or not, 
that he must do everything to keep these worthless vandals from our borders so 
long as the war may last. For if they should be victorious, thousands of our 
comrades will be condemned to horrible prison sentences. Under the Russian 
sceptre there is no such thing as self-expression of the people, no Social 
Democratic press is allowed to exist, Social Democratic meetings and 
organizations are prohibited. We cannot conceive for a moment the possibility 
of a Russian victory. While still upholding our opposition to war, we will all 
work together to protect ourselves against these vandals that rule the Russian 
nation.”``

We shall later enter a little more fully into the relations that exist between 
German culture and Russian Czarism. They form a chapter by itself in the 
position of the German Social Democracy on the war. This much. may be said now, 
one might with as much justification assume that the Czar desires to annex 
Europe or the moon, as to speak of his desire to annex Germany. In the present 
war only two nations are threatened in their national existence, Belgium and 
Serbia. While we howled about safeguarding the national existence of Germany, 
our cannon were directed against these two states. It is impossible to discuss 
with people who still believe in the possibility of ritual murder. But to those 
who do not act from mob instinct, who do not think in terms of clumsy slogans 
that are invented to catch the rabble, who guide their thoughts by historic 
facts, it must be obvious that Russian Czarism cannot have such intentions. 
Russia is ruled by desperate criminals, but not by maniacs. And after all, the 
policies of absolutism, in spite of all their characteristic differences, have 
this similarity in all nations, that they live not on thin air but upon very 
real possibilities, in a realm where concrete things come into the closest 
contact with each other. We need have no fear of the arrest of our German 
comrades and their banishment to Siberia, nor of the introduction of Russian 
absolutism into Germany. For the statesmen of the bloody Czar, with all their 
mental inferiority, have a clearer materialistic conception of the situation 
than some of our party editors. These statesmen know very well that political 
forms of government cannot be “introduced” anywhere and everywhere according to 
the desire of the rulers; they know full well that every form of government is 
the outcome of certain economic and social foundations, they know from bitter 
experience that even in Russia itself conditions are almost beyond their power 
to control; they know, finally, that reaction in every country can use only the 
forms that are in accord with the nature of the country, and that the 
absolutism that is in accord with our class and party conditions is the 
Hohenzollern police state and the Prussian three-class electoral system. A 
dispassionate consideration of the whole situation will show that we need not 
fear that Russian Czarism, even if it should win a complete victory over 
Germany, would feel called upon to do away with these products of German 
culture.

In reality the conflicts that exist between Germany and Russia are of an 
entirely different nature. These differences are not to be found in the field 
of inner politics. Quite the contrary: their mutual tendencies and internal 
relationships have established a century-old traditional friendship between the 
two nations. But in spite of and notwithstanding their solidarity on questions 
of inner policy, they have come to blows in the field of foreign, 
world-political hunting grounds.

Russian imperialism, like that of western nations, consists of widely 
diversified elements. Its strongest strain is not, however, as in Germany or 
England, the economic expansion of capital, hungry for territorial 
accumulation, but the political interests of the nation. To be sure, Russian 
industry can show a considerable export to the Orient, to China, Persia and 
Central Asia, and the Czarist Government seeks to encourage this export trade 
because it furnishes a desirable foundation for its sphere of interest. But 
national policies here play an active, not a passive, role. On the one hand, 
the traditional tendencies of a conquest-loving Czardom, ruling over a mighty 
nation whose population today consists of 172 millions of human beings, demand 
free access to the ocean, to the Pacific Ocean on the East, to the 
Mediterranean on the South, for industrial as well as for strategic reasons. On 
the other hand, the very existence of absolutism, and the necessity of holding 
a respected place in the world-political field, and finally the need of 
financial credit in foreign countries without which Czarism cannot exist, all 
play their important part. We must add to these, as in every other monarchy, 
the dynastic interest. Foreign prestige and temporary forgetfulness of inner 
problems and difficulties are well known family remedies in the art of ruling, 
when a conflict arises between the government and the great mass of the people.

But modern capitalist interests are becoming more and more a factor in the 
imperialist aims of the Czarist nation. Russian capitalism, still in its 
earliest youth, cannot hope to perfect its development under an absolutist 
regime. On the whole it has advanced little beyond the primitive stage of home 
industry. But it sees a gigantic future before its eyes in the exploitation of 
the nation’s natural resources. As soon as Russia’s absolutism is swept away, 
of this there can be no doubt, Russia will develop rapidly into the foremost 
capitalist nation, provided always that the international situation will give 
it the time necessary for such development. It is this hope, and the appetite 
for foreign markets that will mean increased capitalistic development even at 
the present time, that has filled the Russian bourgeoisie with imperialistic 
desires and led them to eagerly voice their demands in the coming division of 
the world’s resources. This historic desire is actively supported by very 
tangible immediate interests. There are, in the first place, the armament 
industry and its purveyors. In the second place the conflicts with the “enemy 
within,” the revolutionary proletariat, have given to the Russian bourgeoisie 
an increased appreciation of the powers of militarism and the distracting 
efforts of a world-political evangel. It has bound together the ,various 
capitalist groups and the nobility under one counterrevolutionary regime. The 
imperialism of bourgeois Russia, particularly among the liberals, has grown 
enormously in the stormy atmosphere of the revolutionary period, and has given 
to the traditional foreign policies of the Romanovs a modern stamp. Chief among 
the aims of the traditional policies of monarchic Russia, as well as of the 
more modern appetites of the Russian bourgeoisie, are the Dardanelles. they 
are, according to the famous remark made by Bismarck, the latchkey to the 
Russian possessions on the Black Sea. Since the eighteenth century, Russia has 
waged a number of bloody wars against Turkey, has undertaken its mission as the 
liberator of the Balkans, for the realization of this goal. For this ideal, 
Russia has piled up mountains of dead in Ismail, in Navarin, in Sinope, 
Silistria and Sevastopol, in Plevna and Shipka. To the Russian muzhik, the 
defence of his Slavic and Christian brothers from the horrors of Turkish 
oppression has become as potent a war legend as the defence of German culture 
and freedom against the horrors of Russia has become to the German Social 
Democracy.

But the Russian bourgeoisie also was much more enthusiastic over the 
Mediterranean prospect than for its Manchurian and Mongolian “mission.” The 
liberal bourgeoisie of Russia criticised the Japanese war so severely as a 
senseless adventure, because it distracted the attention of Russian politics 
from the problem that was to them more important, the Balkans. And in another 
way, the unfortunate war with Japan had the same effect. The extension of 
Russian power into Eastern and Central Asia, to Tibet and down into Persia 
necessarily aroused a feeling of discomfort in the minds of English 
imperialists. England, fearing for its enormous Indian Empire, viewed the 
Asiatic movements of Russia with growing suspicion. In fact, at the beginning 
of the present century the English-Russian conflict in Asia was the strongest 
world-conflict in the international situation. Moreover this will be, in all 
probability, the most critical issue in future world-political developments 
when the present war is over. The crushing defeat of Russia in 1904[14] and the 
subsequent outbreak of the Russian revolution only temporarily changed the 
situation. The apparent weakening of the empire of the Czar brought about a 
relaxation of the tension between England and Russia. In 1907 a treaty was 
signed between the two nations providing for a mutual control of Persia[15] 
that established, for the time being, friendly neighbourly relations in Central 
Asia. This kept Russia from undertaking great projects in the East, and her 
energies reverted all the more vigorously to their old occupation, Balkan 
politics. Here the Russia of the Czar came for the first time into sharp 
conflict with German culture, after a century of faithful and well-founded 
friendship. The road to the Dardanelles leads over the corpse of Turkey. But 
for more than a decade Germany has regarded the “integrity” of this corpse as 
its most important world-political task. Russian methods in the Balkans had 
changed at various times. Embittered by the ingratitude of the liberated Balkan 
Slays who tried to escape from their position as vassals to the Czarist 
Government, Russia for a time supported the programme of Turkish integrity with 
the silent understanding that the division of that country should be postponed 
to some more auspicious time. But today the final liquidation of Turkey 
coincides with the plans of both Russian and English politics. The latter aims 
to unite Arabia and Mesopotamia and the Russian territories that lie between 
Egypt and India, under British rule, into a great Mohammedan empire, thus 
conserving its own position in India and Egypt. In this way Russian 
imperialism, as in earlier times English imperialism, came into opposition with 
that of Germany. For this privileged exploiter of Turkish disintegration had 
taken up her position as sentinel on the Bosphorus.

Russian interests came to a clash in the Balkans not only directly with Germany 
but with Austria as well. Austrian imperialism is the political complement of 
German imperialism, at the same time its Siamese twin brother and its fate.

Germany having isolated herself on all sides by her world policy, has in 
Austria her only ally. The alliance with Austria is old, having been founded by 
Bismarck in 1879. But since that time it has completely changed its character. 
Like the enmity toward France, the alliance with Austria received an entirely 
new content through the development of the last decades. In 1879 its chief 
purpose was the mutual defence of the possessions gained in the wars of 
1864-1870.[16] The Bismarck Triple Alliance was conservative in character, 
especially since it signified Austria’s final renunciation of admission to the 
German federation of states, its acceptance of the state of affairs created by 
Bismarck, and the military hegemony of Greater Prussia. The Balkan aspirations 
of Austria were as distasteful to Bismarck as the South African conquests of 
Germany. In his Gedanken und Erinnerungen[17] he says:

``“It is natural that the inhabitants of the Danube region should have needs 
and aspirations that extend beyond the present boundaries of their monarchy. 
The German national constitution points out the way along which Austria can 
form a union of the political and material interests that exist between the 
most eastern Rumanian tribe and the Bay of Cattaro. But the duty of the German 
Empire does not demand that it satisfy the desires of its neighbours for 
increased territory with the blood and wealth of its subjects.”``

He expressed the same thought still more drastically when he uttered the well 
known sentiment that, to him, the whole of Bosnia was not worth the bone of a 
Pomeranian grenadier. Indeed, a treaty drawn up with Russia in 1884 proves 
conclusively that Bismarck never desired to place the Triple Alliance at the 
service of Austrian annexationist desires. By this treaty, the German Empire 
promised, in the event of a war between Austria and Russia, not to support the 
former, but rather to observe a “benevolent neutrality.”

But since imperialism has taken hold of German politics, its relations to 
Austria have changed as well. Austria-Hungary lies between Germany and the 
Balkans, in other words, on the road over the critical point in German Oriental 
politics. To make Austria its enemy at this time would mean complete isolation, 
and complete abdication by Germany of its world-political plan. But the 
weakening of Austria, which would signify the final liquidation of Turkey, with 
a consequent strengthening of Russia, the Balkan states,. and England, would 
probably accomplish the national unification of Germany, but would, at the same 
time, wipe out, forever, its imperialistic aspirations. The safety of the 
Hapsburg monarchy has therefore logically become a necessary complement to 
German imperialism, the preservation of Turkey its chief problem.

But Austria means a constant latent state of war in the Balkans. For Turkish 
disintegration has promoted the existence and growth of the Balkan States in 
the immediate neighbourhood of the Hapsburg monarchy, and the resulting state 
of chronic incipient warfare. Obviously the existence of virile and independent 
national states on the border of a monarchy that is made up of fragments of 
these same nationalities, which it can rule only by the whip-lash of 
dictatorship must&middot; hasten its downfall. Austrian Balkan politics and 
particularly its Serbian relations have plainly revealed its inner decay. 
Although its imperialistic appetites wavered between Salonika and Durazzo, 
Austria was not in a position to annex Serbia, even before the latter bad grown 
in strength and size through the two Balkan wars. For the forcible annexation 
of Serbia would have dangerously strengthened in its interior one of the most 
refractory South Slavic nationalities, a people that even now, because of 
Austria’s stupid regime of reaction, can scarcely be held in check. But neither 
can Austria tolerate the normal independent development of Serbia or profit 
from it by normal commercial relations. For the Hapsburg monarchy is not the 
political expression of a capitalist state, but a loose syndicate of a few 
parasitic cliques, striving to grasp everything within reach, utilizing the 
political powers of the nation so long as this weak edifice still stands. For 
the benefit of Hungarian agrarians, and for the purpose of increasing the 
prices of agricultural products, Austria has forbidden Serbia to send cattle 
and fruits into Austria, thus depriving this nation of farmers of its most 
important market.[18] In the interest of Austrian monopolies it has forced 
Serbia to import industrial products exclusively from Austria, and at the 
highest, prices. To keep Serbia in a state of economic and political 
dependence, it prevented Serbia from uniting on the East with Bulgaria, to 
secure access to the Black Sea, and from securing access to the Adriatic, on 
the West, by prohibiting the acquisition of a harbour in Albania. In short, the 
Balkan policy of Austria was nothing more than a barefaced attempt to choke off 
Serbia. Also it was directed against the establishment of mutual relations 
between and against the inner growth of the Balkan states, and was, therefore, 
a constant menace for them.

Austrian imperialism constantly threatened the existence and development of the 
Balkan States, now by the annexation of Bosnia, now by its demands upon the 
Sanjak of Novibazar and on Saloniki, now by its encroachments upon the Albanian 
coast. To satisfy these tendencies on the part of Austria, and to meet the 
competition of Italy as well, the caricature of an independent Albania under 
the rule of a German nobleman was created after the second Balkan war, a 
country which was, from the first hour, little more than the plaything of the 
intrigues of imperialistic rivals.

Thus the imperialistic policies of Austria during the last decade were a 
constant hindrance to the normal progressive development of the Balkans, and 
led to the inevitable alternative: either the Hapsburg monarchy or the 
capitalist development of the Balkan States.

Emancipated from Turkish rule, the Balkan now faced its new hindrance, Austria, 
and the necessity of removing it from its path. Historically the liquidation of 
Austria-Hungary is the logical sequence of Turkish disintegration, and both are 
in direct line with the process of historical development.[19]

There was but one solution: war – a world war. For behind Serbia stood Russia, 
unable to sacrifice its influence in the Balkans and its role of “protector” 
without giving up its whole imperialistic programme in the Orient as well. In 
direct conflict with Austrian politics, Russia aimed to unite the Balkan States 
under a Russian protectorate, to be sure. The Balkan union that had almost 
completely annihilated European Turkey in the victorious war of 1912 was the 
work of Russia, and was directly and intentionally aimed against Austria. In 
spite of Russian efforts, the Balkan union was smashed in the second Balkan 
war. But Serbia, emerging the victor, became dependent upon the friendship of 
Russia in the same degree as Austria had become Russia’s bitter enemy. Germany, 
whose fate was firmly linked to that of the Hapsburg monarchy, was obliged to 
back up the stupid Balkan policy of the latter, step by step, and was thus 
brought into a doubly aggravated opposition to Russia.

But the Balkan policies of Austria, furthermore, brought Austria into conflict 
with Italy, which was actively interested in the dissolution of the Turkish and 
Austrian Empires. The imperialism of Italy has found in the Italian possessions 
of Austria a most popular cloak for its own annexationist desires. Its eyes are 
directed especially toward the Albanian coast of the Adriatic, should a new 
regulation of Balkan affairs take place. The Triple Alliance, having already 
sustained a severe blow in the Tripolitan war, was destroyed by-the acute 
crisis in the Balkans during the two Balkan wars. The Central Powers were thus 
brought into conflict with the entire outside world. German imperialism, 
chained to two decaying corpses, was steering its course directly toward a 
world war.

Moreover, Germany embarked upon this course with a full realization of its 
consequences. Austria, as the motive power, was rushing blindly into 
destruction. Its clique of clerical-militarist rulers with the Archduke Franz 
Ferdinand and his right hand man Baron von Chlumezki at the head, fairly jumped 
at every excuse to strike the first blow. In 1909 Austria framed up the famous 
documents by Professor Friedmann, exposing what purported to be a widespread, 
criminal conspiracy of the Serbs against the Hapsburg Monarchy for the sole 
purpose of infusing the German nations with the necessary war-enthusiasm. These 
papers had only one slight drawback – they were forged from beginning to end. A 
year later the rumour of the horrible martyrdom of the Austrian consul Prohaska 
in Ueskub was busily spread for days to serve as the spark that would ignite 
the keg of powder, while Prohaska roamed unmolested and happy through the 
streets of Ueskub. Then came the assassination at Sarajevo, a long desired, 
truly shameful crime.[20] “If ever, blood sacrifice has had a liberating, 
releasing effect, it was the case here,” rejoiced the spokesman of German 
imperialism. Among Austrian imperialists the rejoicing was still greater, and 
they decided to use the noble corpses while they were still warm. After a 
hurried conference with Berl4n, war was virtually decided and the ultimatum 
sent out as a flaming torch that was to set fire to the capitalist world at all 
four corners.

But the occurrence at Sarajevo only furnished the immediate pretext. Causes and 
conflicts for the war had been overripe for a long time. The conjuncture that 
we witness today was ready a decade ago. Every year, every political occurrence 
of recent years has but served to bring war a step nearer: the Turkish 
revolution, the annexation of Bosnia, the Morocco crisis, the Tripoli 
expedition, the two Balkan wars. All military bills of the last years were 
drawn up in direct preparation for this war; the countries, of Europe were 
preparing, with open eyes, for the inevitable final contest. Five times during 
recent years this war was on the verge of an outbreak: in the summer of 1905, 
when Germany for the first time made her decisive demands in the Morocco 
crisis; in the summer of 1908, when England Russia and France threatened with 
war after the conference of the monarchs in Reval over the Macedonian question, 
and war was prevented only by the sudden outbreak of the Turkish revolution; in 
the beginning of 1909 when Russia replied to the Bosnian annexation with a 
mobilization, when Germany in Petersburg formally declared its readiness to go 
to war on the side of Austria; in the summer of 1911 when the Panther was sent 
to Agadir, an act that would certainly have brought on war if Germany had not 
finally acquiesced in the Morocco question and allowed itself to be compensated 
with the Congo concession; and finally, in the beginning of 1913, when Germany, 
in view of the proposed Russian invasion of Albania, a second time threatened 
Petersburg with its readiness for warlike measures.

Thus the world war has been hanging fire for eight years. It was postponed 
again and again only because always one of the two sides in question was not 
yet ready with its military preparations.

So, for instance, the present world war was imminent at the time of the Panther 
adventure in 1911 – without a murdered Grand Duke, without French fliers over 
Nuremberg, without a Russian invasion into East Prussia. Germany simply put it 
off for a more favourable moment – one need only read the frank explanation of 
a German imperialist:

``“The German government has been accused by the so-called pan-Germans of 
weakness in the Morocco crisis in 1911. Let them disabuse their minds of this 
false impression. It is a fact that, at the time when we sent the Panther to 
Agadir, the reconstruction of the North-East Sea Canal was still in progress, 
that building operations on Helgoland for the construction of a great fort were 
nowhere near completion, that our fleet of dreadnoughts and accessories, in 
comparision with the English sea power, was in&middot; a far more unfavourablc 
position than was the case three years later.

“Compared to the present time, 1914, the canal as well as Helgoland were in a 
deplorable state of unreadiness, were partially absolutely useless for war 
purposes. Under such circumstances, where one knows that one’s chances will be 
far more favourable in a few years, it would be worse than foolish to provoke a 
war. First the German fleet had to be put in order; the great military bill had 
to be pushed through the Reichstag. In the summer of 1914 Germany was prepared 
for war, while Prance was still labouring over its three years military service 
programme, while in Russia neither the army nor the naval programme were ready. 
It was up to Germany to utilize the auspicious moment.”``

The same Rohrbach, who is not only the most serious representative of 
imperialism in Germany, but is also in intimate touch with the leading circles 
in German politics and is their semi-official mouthpiece, comments upon the 
situation in July, 1914, as follows: “At this time there was only one danger, 
that we might be morally forced, by an apparent acquiescence on the part of 
Russia, to wait until Russia and France were really prepared.” In other words, 
Germany feared nothing so much as that Russia might give in. “With deep pain we 
saw our untiring efforts to preserve world peace shipwrecked, etc., etc.”[21]

The invasion of Belgium, therefore, and the accomplished fact of war was not a 
bolt from the blue. It did not create a new, unheard of situation. Nor was it 
an event that came, in its political associations, as a complete surprise to 
the Social Democratic group. The world war that began officially on August 4th, 
1914, was the same world war toward which German imperialism had been driving 
for decades, the same war whose coming the Social Democracy and prophesied year 
after year. This same war has been denounced by Social Democratic 
parliamentarians, newspapers and leaflets a thousand times as a frivolous 
imperialistic crime, as a war that is against every interest of culture and 
against every interest of the nation.

And, indeed, not the “existence and the independent development of Gennany in 
this war are at stake, in spite of the reiterations of the Social Democratic 
press, but the immediate profits of the Deutsche Bank in Asiatic Turkey and the 
future profits of the Mannesmann and Krupp interests in Morocco, the existence 
and the reactionary character of Austria, “this heap of organized decay, that 
calls itself the Hapsburg monarchy,” as the Vorwaerts wrote on the 25th of 
July, 1914; Hungarian pigs and prunes, paragraph 14, the “Kultur” of 
Friedmann-Prohaska, the existence of Turkish rule in Asia Minor and of 
counter-revolution on the Balkan.

Our party press was filled with moral indignation over the fact that Germany’s 
foes should drive black men and barbarians, Negroes, Sikhs and Maoris into the 
war. Yet these peoples play a role in this war that is approximately identical 
with that played by the socialist proletariat in the European states. If the 
Maoris of New Zealand were eager to risk their skulls for the English king, 
they showed only as much understanding of their own interests as the German 
Social Democratic group that traded the existence, the freedom and the 
civilization of the German people for the existence of the Hapsburg monarchy, 
for Turkey and for the vaults of the Deutsche Bank.

One difference there is between the two. A generation ago, Maori negroes were 
still cannibals and not students of Marxist philosophy.




Chapter 5

But czarism! In the first moments of the war this was undoubtedly the factor 
that decided the position of our party. In its declaration, the social 
democratic group had given the slogan: against czarism! And out of this the 
socialist press has made a fight for European culture.

The Frankfurter Volksstimme wrote on July 31:

``“The German social democracy has always hated czardom as the bloody guardian 
of European reaction: from the time that Marx and Engels followed, with 
far-seeing eyes, every movement of this barbarian government, down to the 
present day, where its prisons are filled with political prisoners, and yet it 
trembles before every labour movement. The time has come when we must square 
accounts with these terrible scoundrels, under the German flag of war.”``

The Pfälzische Post of Ludwighafen wrote on the same day:

``“This is a principle that was first established by our August Bebel. This is 
the struggle of civilisation against barbarism, and in this struggle the 
proletariat will do its share.”``

The Münchener Post of August 1:

``“When it comes to defending our country against the bloody czardom we will 
not be made citizens of the second class.”``

The Halle Volksblatt wrote on August 5:

``“If this is so, if we have been attacked by Russia, and everything seems to 
corroborate this statement – then the social democracy, as a matter of course, 
must vote in favour of all means of defence. With all our strength we must 
fight to drive czarism from our country!”``

And on August 18:

``“Now that the die is cast in favour of the sword, it is not only the duty of 
national defence and national existence that puts the weapon into our hands as 
into the hands of every German, but also the realisation that in the enemy whom 
we are fighting in the east we are striking a blow at the foe of all culture 
and all progress ... The overthrow of Russia is synonymous with the victory of 
freedom in Europe.”``

On August 5, the Braunschweiger Volksfreund wrote:

``“The irresistible force of military preparation drives everything before it. 
But the class-conscious labour movement obeys, not an outside force, but its 
own conviction, when it defends the ground upon which it stands from attack in 
the east.”``

The Essener Arbeiterzeitung cried out on August 3:

``“If this country is threatened by Russia’s determination, then the social 
democrats, since the fight is against Russian blood – czarism, against the 
perpetrator of a million crimes against freedom and culture, will allow none to 
excel them in the fulfilment of their duty, in their willingness to sacrifice. 
Down with czarism! Down with the home of barbarism! Let that be our slogan!”``

Similarly the Bielefelder Volkswacht writes on August 4:

``“ Everywhere the same cry: against Russian despotism and faithlessness.”``

The Elberfeld party organ on August 5:

``“All Western Europe is vitally interested in the extermination of rotten 
murderous czarism. But this human interest is crushed by the greed of England 
and France to cheek the profits that have been made possible by German 
capital.”``

The Rheinische Zeitung in Cologne:

``“Do your duty, friends, wherever fate may place you. You are fighting for the 
civilisation of Europe, for the independence of your fatherland, for your own 
welfare.”``

The Schleswig-Holstein Volkszeitung of August 7 writes:

``“Of course we are living in an age of capitalism. Of course we will continue 
to have class struggles after the great war is over. But these class struggles 
will be fought out in a freer state, they will be far more confined to the 
economic field than before. In the future the treatment of socialists as 
outcasts, as citizens of the second class, as politically rightless will be 
impossible, once the czardom of Russia has vanished.”``

On August 11, the Hamburger Echo cried:

``“We are fighting to defend ourselves not so much against England and France 
as against czarism. But this war we carry on with the greatest enthusiasm, for 
it is the war for civilisation.”``

And the Lübeck party organ declared, as late as September 4:

``“If European liberty is saved, then Europe will have German arms to thank for 
it Our fight is a fight against the worst enemy of all liberty and all 
democracy.”``

Thus the chorus of the German party press sounded and resounded.

In the beginning of the war the German government accepted the proffered 
assistance. Nonchalantly it fastened the laurels of the liberator of European 
culture to its helmet. Yes, it endeavoured to carry through the role of the 
“liberator of nations,” though often with visible discomfort and rather awkward 
grace. It flattered the Poles and the Jews in Russia, and egged one nation on 
against the other, using the policies that had proven so successful in their 
colonial warfare, where again and again they played up one chief against the 
other. And the social democrats followed each leap and bound of German 
imperialism with remarkable agility. While the Reichstag group covered up every 
shameful outrage with a discrete silence, the social democratic press filled 
the air with jubilant melodies, rejoicing in the liberty that “German 
riflebutts” had brought to the poor victims of czarism.

Even the theoretical organ of the party, Neue Zeit, wrote on the twenty-eighth 
of August:

``“The border population of the ‘little father’s’ realm greeted the coming of 
the German troops with cries of joy. For these Poles and Jews have but one 
conception of their fatherland, that of corruption and rule by the knout. Poor 
devils, really fatherlandless creatures, these downtrodden subjects of bloody 
Nicholas. Even should they desire to do so, they could find nothing to defend 
but their chains. And so they live and toil, hoping and longing that German 
rifles, carried by German men, will crush the whole czarist system ... A clear 
and definite purpose still lives in the German working class, though the 
thunder of a world war is crashing over its head. It will defend itself from 
the allies of Russian barbarism in the west to bring about an honorable peace. 
It will give to the task of destroying czarism the last breath of man and 
beast.”``

After the social democratic group had stamped the war as a war of defence for 
the German nation and European culture, the social democratic press proceeded 
to hail it as the “saviour of the oppressed nations.” Hindenburg became the 
executor of Marx and Engels.

The memory of our party has played it a shabby trick. It forgot all its 
principles, its pledges, the decision of international congresses just at the 
moment when they should have found their application. And to its great 
misfortune, it remembered the heritage of Karl Marx and dug it out of the dust 
of passing years at the very moment when it could serve only to decorate 
Prussian militarism, for whose destruction Karl Marx was willing to sacrifice 
“the last breath of man and beast.” Long forgotten chords that were sounded by 
Marx in the Neue Rheinische Zeitung against the vassal state of Nicholas I, 
during the German March Revolution of 1848, suddenly reawakened in the ears of 
the German social democracy in the year of Our Lord 1914, and called them to 
arms arm in arm with Prussian junkerdom, against the Russia of the Great 
Revolution of 1905.

This is where a revision should have been made; the slogans of the March 
Revolution should have been brought into accord with the historical experiences 
of the last seventy years.

In 1848 Russian czarism was, in truth, “the guardian of European reaction.” The 
product of Russian social conditions, firmly rooted in its medieval, 
agricultural state, absolutism was the protector and at the same time the 
mighty director of monarchical reaction. This was weakened, particularly in 
Germany where a system of small states still obtained. As late as 1851 it was 
possible for Nicholas I to assure Berlin through the Prussian consul von Rochow 
“that he would, indeed, have been pleased to see the revolution destroyed by 
the roots when General von Wrangel advanced upon Berlin in November, 1848.” At 
another time, in a warning to Manteuffel, the mar stated, “that he relied upon 
the imperial ministry, under the leadership of His Highness, to defend the 
rights of the crown against the chambers, and give to the principles of 
conservatism their due.” It was possible for the same Nicholas I to bestow the 
Order of Alexander Nevski on a Prussian ministerial president in recognition of 
his “constant efforts to preserve legal order in Prussia.”

The Crimean War worked a noticeable change in this respect. It ended with the 
military and therefore with the political bankruptcy of the old system. Russian 
absolutism was forced to grant reforms, to modernise its rule, to adjust itself 
to capitalist conditions. In so doing, it gave its little finger to the devil 
who already holds it firmly by the arm, and will eventually get it altogether. 
The Crimean War was, by the way, an instructive example of the kind of 
liberation that can be brought to a downtrodden people “at the point of a gun.” 
The military overthrow at Sedan brought France its republic. But this republic 
was not the gift of the Bismarck soldiery. Prussia, at that time as today, can 
give to other peoples nothing but its own junker rule. Republican France was 
the ripe fruit of inner social struggles and of the three revolutions that had 
preceded it. The crash at Sevastopol was in effect similar to that of Jena. But 
because there was no revolutionary movement in Russia, it led to the outward 
renovation and reaffirmation of the old regime.

But the reforms that opened the road for capitalist development in Russia 
during the sixties were possible only with the money of a capitalist system. 
This money was furnished by Western European capital. It came from Germany and 
France, and has created a new relationship that has lasted down to the present 
day. Russian absolutism is now subsidised by the western European bourgeoisie 
No longer does the Russian ruble “roll in diplomatic chambers” as Prince 
William. of Prussia bitterly complained in 1854, “Into the very chambers of the 
king.” On the contrary, German and French money is rolling to Petersburg to 
feed a regime that would long ago have breathed its last without this 
life-giving juice. Russian czarism is today no longer the product of Russian 
conditions; its root lies in the capitalist conditions of Western Europe. And 
the relationship is shifting from decade to decade. In the same measure as the 
old root of Russian absolutism in Russia itself is being destroyed, the new, 
West European root is growing stronger and stronger. Besides lending their 
financial support, Germany and France, since 1870, have been vying with each 
other to lend Russia their political support as well. As revolutionary forces 
arise from the womb of the Russian people itself to fight against Russian 
absolutism, they meet with an ever growing resistance in Western Europe, which 
stands ready to lend to threatened czarism its moral and political support. So 
when, in the beginning of the eighties the older Russian socialist movement 
severely shook the czarist government and partly destroyed its authority within 
and without, Bismarck made his treaty with Russia and strengthened its position 
in international politics.

Capitalist development, tenderly nurtured by czarism with its own hands, 
finally bore fruit: in the nineties the revolutionary movement of the Russian 
proletariat began. The erstwhile “guardian of reaction!’ was forced to grant a 
meaningless constitution, to seek a new protector from the rising flood in its 
own country. And it found this protector – in Germany. The Germany of Buelow 
must pay the debt of gratitude that the Prussia of Wrangel and Manteuffel had 
incurred. Relations were completely reversed. Russian support against the 
revolution in Germany is superseded by German aid against the revolution in 
Russia. Spies, outrages, betrayals – a demagogic agitation, like that which 
blessed the times of the Holy Alliance, was unleashed in Germany against the 
fighters for the cause of Russian freedom, and followed to the very doorsteps 
of the Russian Revolution. In the Königsberg trial of 1904 this wave of 
persecution was at its height. This trial threw a scathing light upon a whole 
historical development since 1848 and showed the complete change of relations 
between Russian absolutism and European reaction. “Tua res agitur” [Your 
problem is being attended to!] cried a Prussian minister of justice to the 
ruling classes of Germany, pointing to the tottering foundation of the czarist 
regime. “The establishment of a democratic republic in Russia would strongly 
influence Germany,” declared First District Attorney Schulze in Königsberg. 
“When my neighbour’s home burns my own is also in danger.” And his assistant 
Casper also emphasised: “It is naturally not indifferent to Germany’s public 
interests whether this bulwark of absolutism stands or falls. Certainly the 
flames of a revolutionary movement may easily spring over into Germany ...”

The revolution was overthrown, but the very causes that led to its temporary 
downfall are valuable in a discussion of the position taken by the German 
social democracy in this war. That the Russian uprising in 1905-06 was 
unsuccessful in spite of its unequalled expenditure of revolutionary force, its 
clearness of purpose and tenacity can be ascribed to two distinct causes. The 
one lies in the inner character of the revolution itself, in its enormous 
historical program, in the mass of economic and political problems that it was 
forced to face. Some of them, for instance, the agrarian problem, cannot 
possibly be solved within capitalist society. There was the difficulty 
furthermore of creating a class state for the supremacy of the modern 
bourgeoisie against the counter-revolutionary opposition of the bourgeoisie as 
a whole. To the onlooker it would seem that the Russian Revolution was doomed 
to failure because it was a proletarian revolution with bourgeois duties and 
problems, or if you wish, a bourgeois revolution waged by socialist proletarian 
methods, a crash of two generations amid lightning and thunder, the fruit of 
the delayed industrial development of class conditions in Russia and their 
over-ripeness in Western Europe. From this point of view its downfall in 1906 
signifies not its bankruptcy, but the natural closing of the first chapter, 
upon which the second must follow with the inevitability of a natural law.

The second cause was of external nature; it lay in Western Europe. European 
reaction once more hastened to help its endangered protege; not with lead and 
bullets, although “German guns” were in German fists even in 1905 and only 
waited for a signal from Petersburg to attack the neighbouring Poles. Europe 
rendered an assistance that was equally valuable: financial subsidy and 
political alliances were arranged to help czarism in Russia. French money paid 
for the armed forces that broke down the Russian Revolution; from Germany came 
the moral and political support that helped the Russian government to clamber 
out from the depths of shame into which Japanese torpedoes and Russian 
proletarian fists had thrust it. In 1910, in Potsdam, official Germany received 
Russian czarism with open arms. The reception of the blood-stained monarch at 
the gates of the German capital was not only the German blessing for the 
throttling of Persia, but above all for the hangman’s work of the Russian 
counter-revolution. It was the official banquet of German and European “Kultur” 
over what they believed to be the grave of the Russian Revolution.

And strange! At that time, when this challenging feast upon the grave of the 
Russian Revolution was held in its own home, the German social democracy 
remained silent, and had completely forgotten “the heritage of our masters” 
from 1848. At that time, when the hangman was received in Potsdam, not a sound, 
not a protest, not an article vetoed this expression of solidarity with the 
Russian counter-revolution. Only since this war has begun, since the police 
permits it, the smallest party organ intoxicates itself with bloodthirsty 
attacks upon the hangman of Russian liberty. Yet nothing could have disclosed 
more clearly than did this triumphal tour of the czar in 1910 that the 
oppressed Russian proletariat was the victim, not only of domestic reaction, 
but of Western European reaction as well. Their fight, like that of the March 
revolutionists of 1848, was against reaction, not only in their own country, 
but against its guardians in all other European countries.

After the inhuman crusades of the counter-revolution had somewhat subsided, the 
revolutionary ferment in the Russian proletariat once more became active. The 
flood began to rise and to boil. Economic strikes in Russia, according to the 
official reports, involved 46,623 workers and 256,386 days in 1910; 96,730 
workers and 768,556 days in 1911; and 89,771 workers and 1,214,881 days in the 
first five months of 1912. Political mass strikes, protests and demonstrations 
comprised 1,005,000 workers in 1912, 1,272,000 in 1913. In 1914 the flood rose 
higher and higher. On January 22, the anniversary of the beginning of the 
revolution, there was a demonstration mass strike of 200,000 workers. As in the 
days before the revolution of 1905, the flame broke out in June, in the 
Caucasus. In Baku, 40,000 workers were on a general strike. The flames leaped 
over to Petersburg. On the seventeenth of June 80,000 workers in Petersburg 
laid down their tools, on the twentieth of July, 200,000 were out; July 23 the 
general strike movement was spreading out all over Russia, barricades were 
being built, the revolution was on its way. A few more months and it would have 
come, its flags fluttering in the wind. A few more years, and perhaps the whole 
world political constellation would have been changed. imperialism perhaps 
would have received a firm check on its mad impulse.

But German reaction checked the revolutionary movement. From Berlin and Vienna 
came declarations of war, and the Russian Revolution was buried beneath its 
wreckage. “German guns” are shattering, not czarism, but its most dangerous 
enemy. The hopefully fluttering flag of the revolution sank down amid a wild 
whirlpool of war. But it sank honourably, and it will rise again out of the 
horrible massacre, in spite of “German guns,” in spite of victory or defeat for 
Russia on the battlefields.

The national revolts in Russia which the Germans tried to foster, too, were 
unsuccessful. The Russian provinces were evidently less inclined to fall for 
the bait of Hindenburg’s cohorts than the German social democracy. The Jews, 
practical people that they are, were able to count on their fingers that 
“German fists” which have been unable to overthrow their own Prussian reaction, 
can hardly be expected to smash Russian absolutism. The Poles, exposed to the 
triple-headed war, were not in a position to answer their “liberators” in 
audible language. But they will have remembered that Polish children were 
taught to say the Lord’s prayer in the German language with bloody welts on 
their backs, will not have forgotten the liberality of Prussian anti-Polish 
laws. All of them, Poles, Jews and Russians, had no difficulty in understanding 
that the “German gun,” when it descends upon their heads, brings not liberty, 
but death.

To couple the legend of Russian liberation with its Marxian heritage is worse 
than a poor joke on the part of the German social democracy. It is a crime. To 
Marx, the Russian revolution was a turning point in the history of the world. 
Every political and historical perspective was made dependent upon the one 
consideration, “provided the Russian revolution has not already broken out.” 
Marx believed in the Russian revolution and expected it even at a time when 
Russia was only a state of vassals. When the war broke out the Russian 
Revolution had occurred. Its first attempt had not been victorious; but it 
could not be ignored; it is on the order of the day. And yet our German social 
democrats came with “German guns,” declaring the Russian Revolution null and 
void, struck it from the pages of history. In 1848 Marx spoke from the German 
barricades; in Russia there was a hopeless reaction. In 1914 Russia was in the 
throes of a revolution; while its German “liberators” were cowed by the fists 
of Prussian junkerdom.

But the liberating mission of the German armies was only an episode. German 
imperialism soon raised its uncomfortable mask and turned openly against France 
and England. Here, too, it was supported valiantly by a large number of the 
party papers. They ceased railing against the bloody czar, and held up 
“perfidious Albion” and its merchant soul to the public disdain. They set out 
to free Europe, no longer from Russian absolutism, but from English naval 
supremacy. The hopeless confusion in which the party had become entangled found 
a drastic illustration in the desperate attempt made by the more thoughtful 
portion of our party press to meet this new change of front. In vain they tried 
to force the war back into its original channels, to nail it down to the 
“heritage of our masters” – that is, to the myth that they, the social 
democracy, had themselves created. “With heavy heart I have been forced to 
mobilise the army against a neighbour at whose side I have fought on so many 
battlefields. With honest sorrow I saw a friendship, truly served by Germany, 
break.” That was simple, open, honest. But when the rhetoric of the first weeks 
of war backed down before the lapidary language of imperialism, the German 
social democracy lost its only plausible excuse.



Chapter 6

Of equal importance in the attitude of the social democracy was the official 
adoption of a program of civil peace, i.e., the cessation of the class struggle 
for the duration of the war. The declaration that was read by the social 
democratic group in the Reichstag on the fourth of August had been agreed upon 
in advance with representatives of the government and the capitalist parties. 
It was little more than a patriotic grandstand play, prepared behind the scenes 
and delivered for the benefit of the people at home and in other nations.

To the leading elements in the labour movement, the vote in favour of the war 
credits by the Reichstag group was a cue for the immediate settlement of all 
labour controversies. Nay more, they announced this to the manufacturers as a 
patriotic duty incurred by labour when it agreed to observe a civil peace. 
These same labour leaders undertook to supply city labour to farmers in order 
to assure a prompt harvest. The leaders of the social democratic women’s 
movement united with capitalist women for “national service” and placed the 
most important elements that remained after the mobilisation at the disposal of 
national Samaritan work. Socialist women worked in soup kitchens and on 
advisory commissions instead of carrying on agitation work for the party.

Under the anti-socialist laws the party had utilised parliamentary elections to 
spread its. agitation and to keep a firm hold upon the population in spite of 
the state of siege that had been declared against the party and the persecution 
of the socialist press. In this crisis the social democratic movement has 
voluntarily relinquished all propaganda and education in the interest of the 
proletarian class struggle, during Reichstag and Landtag elections. 
Parliamentary elections have everywhere been reduced to the simple bourgeois 
formula; the catching of votes for the candidates of the party on the basis of 
an amicable and peaceful settlement with its capitalist opponents. When the 
social democratic representatives in the Landtag and in the municipal 
commissions – with the laudable exceptions of the Prussian and Alsatian Landtag 
– with high sounding references to the existing state of civil peace, voted 
their approval of the war credits that had been demanded, it only emphasised 
how completely the party had broken with things as they were before the war.

The social democratic press, with a few exceptions, proclaimed the principle of 
national unity as the highest duty of the German people. It warned the people 
not to withdraw their funds from the savings banks lest by so doing they 
unbalance the economic life of the nation, and hinder the savings banks in 
liberally buying war-loan bonds. It pleaded with proletarian women that they 
should spare their husbands at the front the tales of suffering that they and 
their children were being forced to undergo, to bear in silence the neglect of 
the government, to cheer the fighting warriors with happy stories of family 
life and favourable reports of prompt assistance through government agencies. 
They rejoiced that the educational work that had been conducted for so many 
years in and through the labour movement had become a conspicuous asset in 
conducting the war. Something of this spirit the following example will show:

``“A friend in need is a friend indeed. This old adage has once more proven its 
soundness. The social democratic proletariat that has been prosecuted and 
clubbed for its opinions went, like one man, to protect our homes. German 
labour unions that had so often suffered both in Germany and in Prussia report 
unanimously that the best of their members have joined the colours. Even 
capitalist papers like the General-Anzeiger note the fact and express the 
conviction that ‘these people’ will do their duty as well as any man, that 
blows will rain most heavily where they stand.

“As for us, we are convinced that our labour unionists can do more than deal 
out blows. Modern mass armies have by no means simplified the work of their 
generals. It is practically impossible to move forward large troop divisions in 
close marching order under the deadly fire of modern artillery. Ranks must be 
carefully widened, must be more accurately controlled. Modern warfare requires 
discipline and clearness of vision not only in the divisions but in every 
individual soldier. The war will show how vastly human material has been 
improved by the educational work of the labour unions, how well their activity 
will serve the nation in these times of awful stress. The Russian and the 
French soldier may be capable of marvellous deeds of bravery. But in cool, 
collected consideration none will surpass the German labour unionists. Then 
too, many of our organised workers know the ways and byways of the borderland 
as well as they know their own pockets, and not a few of them are accomplished 
linguists. The Prussian advance in 1866 has been termed a schoolmasters’ 
victory. This will be a victory of labour union leaders” (Frankfurter 
Volksstimme, August 18, 1914).``

In the same strain Neue Zeit, the theoretical organ of the party, declared 
(no.23, September 25, 1914):

``“Until the question of victory or defeat has been decided, all doubts must 
disappear, even as to the causes of the war. Today there can be no difference 
of party, class and nationality within the army or the population.”``

And in number 8, November 27, 1914, the same Neue Zeit declared in a chapter on 
The Limitations of the International:

``“The world war divides the socialists of the world into different camps and 
especially into different national camps. The International cannot prevent 
this. In other words, the International ceases to be an effective instrument in 
times of war. It is, on the whole, a peace instrument. Its great historic 
problem is the struggle for peace and the class struggle in times of peace.”``

Briefly, therefore, beginning with the fourth of August until the day when 
peace shall be declared, the social democracy has declared the class struggle 
extinct. The first thunder of Krupp cannons in Belgium welded Germany into a 
wonderland of class solidarity and social harmony.

How is this miracle to be understood? The class struggle is known to be not a 
social democratic invention that can be arbitrarily set aside for a period of 
time whenever it may seem convenient to do so. The proletarian class struggle 
is older than the social democracy, is an elementary product of class society. 
It flamed up all over Europe when capitalism first came into power. The modern 
proletariat was not led by the social democracy into the class struggle. On the 
contrary the international social democratic movement was called into being by 
the class struggle to bring a conscious aim and unity into the various local 
and scattered fragments of the class struggle.

What then has changed in this respect when the war broke out? Have private 
property, capitalist exploitation and class rule ceased to exist? Or have the 
propertied classes in a spell of patriotic fervour declared: in view of the 
needs of the war we hereby turn over the means of production, the earth, the 
factories and the mills therein, into the possession of the people? Have they 
relinquished the right to make profits out of these possessions? Have they set 
aside all political privileges, will they sacrifice them upon the altar of the 
fatherland, now that it is in danger? It is, to say the least, a rather naive 
hypothesis, and sounds almost like a story from a kindergarten primer. And yet 
the declaration of our official leaders that the class struggle has been 
suspended permits no other interpretation. Of course nothing of the sort has 
occurred. Property rights, exploitation and class rule, even political 
oppression in all its Prussian thoroughness, have remained intact. The cannons 
in Belgium and in Eastern Prussia have not had the slightest influence upon the 
fundamental social and political structure of Germany.

The cessation of the class struggle was, therefore, a deplorably one-sided 
affair. While capitalist oppression and exploitation, the worst enemies of the 
working class, remain; socialist and labour union leaders have generously 
delivered the working class, without a struggle, into the hands of the enemy 
for the duration of the war. While the ruling classes are fully armed with the 
property and supremacy rights, the working class, at the advice of the social 
democracy, has laid down its arms.

Once before, in 1848 in France, the proletariat experienced this miracle of 
class harmony, this fraternity of all classes of a modern capitalist state of 
society. In his Class Struggles in France, Karl Marx writes:

``“In the eyes of the proletariat, who confused the moneyed aristocracy with 
the bourgeoisie, in the imagination of republican idealists, who denied the 
very existence of classes, or attributed them to a monarchical form of 
government, in the deceitful phrases of those bourgeois who had hitherto been 
excluded from power, the rule of the bourgeoisie was ended when the republic 
was proclaimed. At that time all royalists became republican, all millionaires 
in Paris became labourers. In the word Fraternité, the brotherhood of man, this 
imaginary destruction of classes found official expression. This comfortable 
abstraction from class differences, this sentimental balancing of class 
interests, this utopian disregard of the class struggle, this Fraternité was 
the real slogan of the February Revolution ... The Parisian proletariat 
rejoiced in an orgy of brotherhood ... The Parisian proletariat, looking upon 
the republic as its own creation, naturally acclaimed every act of the 
provisional bourgeois government. Willingly it permitted Caussidiere to use its 
members as policemen to protect the property of Paris. With unquestioning faith 
it allowed Louis Blanc to regulate wage differences between workers and 
masters. In their eyes it was a matter of honour to preserve the fair name of 
the republic before the peoples of Europe.”``

Thus in February 1848, a naïve Parisian proletariat set aside the class 
struggle. But let us not forget that even they committed this mistake only 
after the July monarchy had been crushed by their revolutionary action, after a 
republic had been established. The fourth of August, 1914, is an inverted 
February Revolution. It is the setting aside of class differences, not under a 
republic, but under a military monarchy, not after a victory of the people over 
reaction, but after a victory of reaction over the people, not with the 
proclamation of Liberté, Égalité, Fraternité, but with the proclamation of a 
state of siege, after the press had been choked and the constitution 
annihilated.

Impressively the government of Germany proclaimed a civil peace. Solemnly the 
parties promised to abide by it. But as experienced politicians these gentlemen 
know full well that it is fatal to trust too much to promises. They secured 
civil peace for themselves by the very real measure of a military dictatorship. 
This too the social democratic group accepted without protest or opposition. In 
the declarations of August 4 and December 2 there is not a syllable of 
indignation over the affront contained in the proclamation of military rule. 
When it voted for civil peace and war credits, the social democracy silently 
gave its consent to military rule as well, and laid itself, bound and gagged, 
at the feet of the ruling classes. The declaration of military rule was purely 
an antisocialist measure. From no other side were resistance, protest, action, 
and difficulties to be expected. As a reward for its capitulation the social 
democracy merely received what it would have received under any circumstances, 
even after an unsuccessful resistance, namely, military rule. The impressive 
declaration of the Reichstag group emphasises the old socialist principle of 
the right of nations to self-determination, as an explanation of their vote in 
favour of war credits. Self-determination for the German proletariat was the 
straightjacket of a siege. Never in the history of the world has a party made 
itself more ridiculous.

But, more! In refuting the existence of the class struggle, the social 
democracy has denied the very basis of its own existence. What is the very 
breath of its body, if not the class struggle? What role could it expect to 
play in the war, once having sacrificed the class struggle, the fundamental 
principle of its existence? The social democracy has destroyed its mission, for 
the period of the war, as an active political party, as a representative of 
working-class politics. It has thrown aside the most important weapon it 
possessed, the power of criticism of the war from the peculiar point of view of 
the working class. Its only mission now is to play the role of the gendarme 
over the working class under a state of military rule.

German freedom, that same German freedom for which, according to the 
declaration of the Reichstag group, Krupp cannons are now fighting, has been 
endangered by this attitude of the social democracy far beyond the period of 
the present war. The leaders of the social democracy are convinced that 
democratic liberties for the working class will come as a reward for its 
allegiance to the fatherland. But never in the history of the world has an 
oppressed class received political rights as a reward for service rendered to 
the ruling classes. History is full of examples of shameful deceit on the part 
of the ruling classes, even when solemn promises were made before the war broke 
out. The social democracy has not assured the extension of liberty in Germany. 
It has sacrificed those liberties that the working class possessed before the 
war broke out.

The indifference with which the German people have allowed themselves to be 
deprived of the freedom of the press, of the right of assembly and of public 
life, the fact that they not only calmly bore, but even applauded, the state of 
siege is unexampled in the history of modern society. In England the freedom of 
the press has nowhere been violated, in France there is incomparably more 
freedom of public opinion than in Germany. In no country has public opinion so 
completely vanished, nowhere has it been so completely superseded by official 
opinion, by the order of the government, as in Germany. Even in Russia there is 
only the destructive work of a public censor who effectively wipes out 
opposition of opinion. But not even there have they descended to the custom of 
providing articles ready for the press to the opposition papers.

In no other country has the government forced the opposition press to express 
in its columns the politics that have been dictated and ordered by the 
government in “Confidential Conferences!’ Such measures were unknown even in 
Germany during the war of 1870. At that time the press enjoyed unlimited 
freedom, and accompanied the events of the war, to Bismarck’s active 
resentment, with criticism that was often exceedingly sharp. The newspapers 
were full of active discussion on war aims, on questions of annexation, and 
constitutionality. When Johann Jacobi was arrested, a storm of indignation 
swept over Germany, so that even Bismarck felt obliged to disavow all 
responsibility for this “mistake” of the powers of reaction. Such was the 
situation in Germany at a time when Bebel and Liebknecht, in the name of the 
German working class, had declined all community of interests with the ruling 
jingoes. It took a social democracy with four and a half million votes to 
conceive of the touching Burgfrieden, to assent to war credits, to bring upon 
us the worst military dictatorship that was ever suffered to exist. That such a 
thing is possible in Germany today, had not only the bourgeois press, but the 
highly developed and influential socialist press as well, permits these things 
without even the pretence of opposition bears a fatal significance for the 
future of German liberty. It proves that society in Germany today has within 
itself no foundation for political freedom, since it allows itself to be thus 
lightly deprived of its most sacred rights.

Let us not forget that the political rights that existed in Germany before the 
war were not won, as were those of France and England, in great and repeated 
revolutionary struggles, are not firmly anchored in the lives of the people by 
the power of revolutionary tradition. They are the gift of a Bismarckian policy 
granted after a period of victorious counter-revolution that lasted over twenty 
years. German liberties did not ripen on the field of revolution, they are the 
product of diplomatic gambling by Prussian military monarchy, they are the 
cement with which this military monarchy has united the present German empire. 
Danger threatens the free development of German freedom not, as the German 
Reichstag group believes, from Russia, but in Germany itself. It lies in the 
peculiar counter-revolutionary origin of the German constitution, and looms 
dark in the reactionary powers that have controlled the German state since the 
empire was founded, conducting a silent but relentless war against these 
pitiful “German liberties.”

The Junkers of East of the Elbe, the business jingoes, the arch-reactionaries 
of the Center, the degraded “German liberals,” the personal rulership, the sway 
of the sword, the Zabern policy that triumphed all over Germany before the war 
broke out, these are the real enemies of culture and liberty; and the war, the 
state of siege and the attitude of the social democracy are strengthening the 
powers of darkness all over the land. The liberal, to be sure, can explain away 
this graveyard quietly in Germany with a characteristically liberal 
explanation; to him it is only a temporary sacrifice, for the duration of the 
war. But to a people that are politically ripe, a sacrifice of their rights and 
their public life, even temporarily, is as impossible as for a human being to 
give up, for a time, his right to breathe. A people that give silent consent to 
military government in times of war thereby admit that political independence 
at any time is superfluous. The passive submission of the social democracy to 
the present state of siege and its vote for war credits without attaching the 
slightest condition thereto, its acceptance of a civil peace, has demoralised 
the masses, the only existing pillar of German constitutional government, has 
strengthened the reaction of its rulers, the enemies of constitutional 
government.

By sacrificing the class struggle, our party has moreover, once and for all, 
given up the possibility of making its influence effectively felt in 
determining the extent of the war and the terms of peace. To its own official 
declaration, its acts have been a stinging blow. While protesting against all 
annexations, which are, after all, the logical consequences of an imperialist 
war that is successful from the military point of view, it has handed over 
every weapon that the working class possessed that might have empowered the 
masses to mobilise public opinion in their own direction, to exert an effective 
pressure upon the terms of war and of peace. By assuring militarism of peace 
and quiet at home, the social democracy has given its military rulers 
permission to follow their own course without even considering the interests of 
the masses, has unleashed in the hearts of the ruling classes the most 
unbridled imperialistic tendencies. In other words, when the social democracy 
adopted its platform of civil peace, and the political disarmament of the 
working class, it condemned its own demand of no annexations to impotence.

Thus the social democracy has added another crime to the heavy burden it 
already has to bear, namely the lengthening of the war. The commonly accepted 
dogma that we can oppose the war only so tong as it is threatened has become a 
dangerous trap. As an inevitable consequence, once the war has come, social 
democratic political action is at an end. There can be, then, but one question, 
victory or defeat, i.e., the class struggle must stop for the period of the 
war. But actually the greatest problem for the political movement of the social 
democracy begins only after the war has broken out. At the International 
congresses held in Stuttgart in 1907 and in Basel in 1912, the German party and 
labour union leaders unanimously voted in favour of a resolution which says:

``“Should war nevertheless break out, it shall be the duty of the social 
democracy to work for a speedy peace, and to strive with every means in its 
power to utilise the industrial and political crisis to accomplish the 
awakening of the people, thus hastening the overthrow of the capitalist class 
rule.”``

What has the social democracy done in this war? Exactly the contrary. By voting 
in favour of war credits and entering upon a civil peace, it has striven, by 
all the means in its power, to prevent the industrial and political crisis, to 
prevent an awakening of the masses by the war. It strives “with all the means 
in its power” to save the capitalist state from its own anarchy to reduce the 
number of its victims. It is claimed – we have often heard this argument used 
by Reichstag deputies – that not one man less would have fallen upon the 
battlefields if the social democratic group had voted against the war credits. 
Our party press has steadfastly maintained that we must support and join in the 
defence of our country in order to reduce the number of bloody victims that 
this war shall cost.

But the policy that we have followed out has had exactly the opposite effect In 
the first place, thanks to the civil peace, and the patriotic attitude of the 
social democracy, the imperialist war unleashed its furies without fear. 
Hitherto, fear of restiveness at home, fear of the fury of the hungry populace 
have been a load upon the minds of the ruling classes that effectively checked 
them in their bellicose desires. In the well-known words of Buelow: “They are 
trying to put off the war chiefly because they fear the social democracy.” 
Rohrbach says in his Krieg und die Deutsche Politik, page 7, “unless elemental 
catastrophies intervene, the only power that can force Germany to make peace is 
the hunger of the breadless.” Obviously, he meant a hunger that attracts 
attention, that forces itself unpleasantly upon the ruling classes in order to 
force them to pay heed to its demands. Let us see, finally, what a prominent 
military theoretician, General Bernhardi, says, in his great work Vom Heutigen 
Kriege:

``“Thus modern mass armies make war difficult for a variety of reasons. 
Moreover they constitute, in and of themselves, a danger that must never be 
underestimated.

“The mechanism of such an army is so huge and so complicated, that it can 
remain efficient and flexible only so long as its cogs and wheels work, in the 
main, dependably, and obvious moral confusion is carefully prevented. These are 
things that cannot be completely avoided, as little as we can conduct a war 
exclusively with victorious battles. They can be overcome if they appear only 
within certain restricted limits. But when great, compact masses once shake off 
their leaders, when a spirit of panic becomes widespread, when a lack of 
sustenance becomes extensively felt, when the spirit of revolt spreads out 
among the masses of the army, then the army becomes not only ineffectual 
against the enemy, it becomes a menace to itself and to its leaders. When the 
army bursts the bands of discipline, when it voluntarily interrupts the course 
of military operation, it creates problems that its leaders are unable to solve.

“War, with its modern mass armies, is, under all circumstances, a dangerous 
game, a game that demands the greatest possible sacrifice, personal and 
financial sacrifice the state can offer. Under such circumstances it is clear 
that provision must be made everywhere that the war, once it has broken out, be 
brought to an end as quickly as possible, to release the extreme tension that 
must accompany this supreme effort on the part of whole nations.”``

Thus capitalist politicians and military authorities alike believe war, with 
its modern mass armies, to be a dangerous game. And therein lay for the social 
democracy the most effectual opportunity to prevent the rulers of the present 
day from precipitating war and to force them to end it as rapidly as possible. 
But the position of the social democracy in this war cleared away all doubts, 
has torn down the dams that held back the storm-flood of militarism. In fact it 
has created a power for which neither Bernhardi nor any other capitalist 
statesman dared hope in his wildest dreams. From the camp of the social 
democrats came the cry: “Durchhalten” [see it through], i.e., the continuation 
of this human slaughter. And so the thousands of victims that have fallen for 
months on battlefields lie upon our conscience.




Chapter 7

``“But since we have been unable to prevent the war, since it has come in spite 
of us, and our country is facing invasion, shall we leave our country 
defenceless! Shall we deliver it into the hands of the enemy? Does not 
socialism demand the right of nations to determine their own destinies? Does it 
not mean that every people is justified, nay more, is in duty bound, to protect 
its liberties, its independence? ‘When the house is on fire, shall we not first 
try to put out the blaze before stopping to ascertain the incendiary?’”``

These arguments have been repeated, again and again in defence of the attitude 
of the social democracy in Germany and in France.

Even in the neutral countries this argument has been used. Translated into 
Dutch we read for instance:

``“When the ship leaks must we not seek, first of all, to stop the hole?”``

To be sure. Fie upon a people that capitulates before invasion and fie upon a 
party that capitulates before the enemy within.

But there is one thing that the firemen in the burning house have forgotten: 
that in the mouth of a socialist, the phrase “defending one’s fatherland” 
cannot mean playing the role of cannon fodder under the command of an 
imperialistic bourgeoisie.

Is an invasion really the horror of all horrors, before which all class 
conflict within the country must subside as though spellbound by some 
supernatural witchcraft? According to the police theory of bourgeois patriotism 
and military rule, every evidence of the class struggle is a crime against the 
interests of the country because they maintain that it constitutes a weakening 
of the stamina of the nation. The social democracy has allowed itself to be 
perverted into this same distorted point of view. Has not the history of modern 
capitalist society shown that in the eyes of capitalist society, foreign 
invasion is by no means the unmitigated terror as it is generally painted; that 
on the contrary, it is a measure to which the bourgeoisie has frequently and 
gladly resorted as an effective weapon against the enemy within? Did not the 
Bourbons and the aristocrats of France invite foreign invasion against the 
Jacobins? Did not the Austrian counter-revolution in 1849 call out the French 
invaders against Rome, the Russian against Budapest? Did not the “Party of Law 
and Order” in France in 1850 openly threaten an invasion of the Cossacks in 
order to bring the National Assembly to terms? And was not the Bonaparte army 
released, and the support of the Prussian army against the Paris Commune 
assured, by the famous contract between Jules Favre, Thiers and Co., and 
Bismarck?

This historical evidence led Karl Marx, forty-five years ago, to expose the 
“national wars” of modern capitalist society as miserable frauds. In his famous 
address to the General Council of the International on the downfall of the 
Paris Commune, he said:

``“That, after the greatest war of modern times the belligerent armies, the 
victor and the vanquished, should unite for the mutual butchery of the 
proletariat – this incredible event proves, not as Bismarck would have us 
believe, the final overthrow of the new social power, but the complete 
disintegration of the old bourgeois society. The highest heroic accomplishment 
of which the old order is capable is the national war. And this has now proved 
to be a fraud perpetrated by government for no other purpose than to put off 
the class struggle, a fraud that is bared as soon as the class struggle flares 
up in a civil war. Class rule can no longer hide behind a national uniform. The 
national governments are united against the proletariat.”``

In capitalist history, invasion and class struggle are not opposites, as the 
official legend would have us believe, but one is the means and the expression 
of the other. Just as invasion is the true and tried weapon in the hands of 
capital against the class struggle, so on the other hand the fearless pursuit 
of the class struggle has always proven the most effective preventive of 
foreign invasions. On the brink of modern times are the examples of the Italian 
cities, Florence and Milan, with their century of bitter struggle against the 
Hohenstaufen. The stormy history of these cities, torn by inner conflicts, 
proves that the force and the fury of inner class struggles not only does not 
weaken the defensive powers of the community, but that, on the contrary, from 
their fires shoot the only flames that are strong enough to withstand every 
attack from a foreign foe.

But the classic example of our own times is the Great French Revolution. In 
1793 Paris, the heart of France, was surrounded by enemies. And yet Paris and 
France at that time did not succumb to the invasion of a stormy flood of 
European coalition; on the contrary, it welded its force in the face of the 
growing danger to a more gigantic opposition. If France, at that critical time, 
was able to meet each new coalition of the enemy with a new miraculous and 
undiminished fighting spirit, it was only because of the impetuous loosening of 
the inmost forces of society in the great struggle of the classes of France. 
Today, in the perspective of a century, it is clearly discernible that only 
this intensification of the class struggle, that only the dictatorship of the 
French people and their fearless radicalism, could produce means and forces out 
of the soil of ‘France, sufficient to defend and to sustain a newborn society 
against a world of enemies, against the intrigues of a dynasty, against the 
traitorous machinations of the aristocrats, against the attempts of the clergy, 
against the treachery of their generals, against the opposition of sixty 
departments and provincial capitals, and against the united armies and navies 
of monarchical Europe. The centuries have proven that not the state of siege, 
but relentless class struggle, is the power that awakens the spirit of 
self-sacrifice, the moral strength of the masses; that the class struggle is 
the best protection and the best defence against a foreign enemy.

Ibis same tragic quid pro quo victimised the social democracy when it based its 
attitude in this war upon the doctrine of the right of national 
self-determination.

It is true that socialism gives to every people the right of independence and 
the freedom of independent control of its own destinies. But it is a veritable 
perversion of socialism to regard present-day capitalist society as the 
expression of this self-determination of nations. Where is there a nation in 
which the people have had the right to determine the form and conditions of 
their national, political and social existence? In Germany the determination of 
the people found concrete expression in the demands formulated by the German 
revolutionary democrats of 1848; the first fighters of the German proletariat, 
Marx, Engels, Lassalle, Bebel and Liebknecht, proclaimed and fought for a 
united German Republic. For this ideal the revolutionary forces in Berlin and 
in Vienna, in those tragic days of March, shed their heart’s blood upon the 
barricades. To carry out this program, Marx and Engels demanded that Prussia 
take up arms against czarism. The foremost demand made in the national program 
was for the liquidation of “the heap of organised decay, the Habsburg 
monarchy,” as well as of two dozen other dwarf monarchies within Germany 
itself. The overthrow of the German revolution, the treachery of the German 
bourgeoisie to its own democratic ideals, led to the Bismarck regime and to its 
creature, present-day Greater Prussia, twenty-five fatherlands under one helm, 
the German Empire.

Modern Germany is built upon the grave of the March Revolution [of 1848] upon 
the wreckage of the right of self-determination of the German people. The 
present war, supporting Turkey and the Habsburg monarchy, and strengthening 
German military autocracy is a second burial of the March revolutionists, and 
of the national program of the German people. It is a fiendish jest of history 
that the social democrats, the heirs of the German patriots of 1848, should go 
forth in this war with the banner of “self-determination of nations” held aloft 
in their hands. But, perhaps the Third French Republic, with its colonial 
possessions in four continents and its colonial horrors in two, is the 
expression of the self-determination of the French nation? Or the British 
nation, with its India, with its South African rule of a million whites over a 
population of five million coloured people? Or perhaps Turkey, or the empire of 
the czar?

Capitalist politicians, in whose eyes the rulers of the people and the ruling 
classes are the nation, can honestly speak of the “right of national 
self-determination” in connection with such colonial empire. To the socialist, 
no nation is free whose national existence is based upon the enslavement of 
another people, for to him colonial peoples, too, are human beings, and, as 
such, parts of the national state. International socialism recognises the right 
of free independent nations, with equal rights. But socialism alone can create 
such nations, can bring self-determination of their peoples. This slogan of 
socialism is like all its others, not an apology for existing conditions, but a 
guidepost, a spur for the revolutionary, regenerative, active policy of the 
proletariat. So long as capitalist states exist, Le., so long as imperialistic 
world policies determine and regulate the inner and the outer life of a nation, 
there can be no “national self-determination” either m war or in peace.

In the present imperialistic milieu there can be no wars of national 
self-defence. Every socialist policy that depends upon this determining 
historic milieu, that is willing to fix its policies in the world whirlpool 
from the point of view of a single nation, is built upon a foundation of sand.

We have already attempted to show the background for the present conflict 
between Germany and her opponents. It was necessary to show up more clearly the 
actual forces and relations that constitute the motive power behind the present 
war, because this legend of the defence of the existence, the freedom and 
civilisation of Germany plays an important part in the attitude of our group in 
the Reichstag and our socialist press. Against this legend historical truth 
must be emphasised to show that this is a war that has been prepared by German 
militarism and its world political ideas for years, that it was brought about 
in the summer of 1914, by Austrian and German diplomacy, with a full 
realisation of its import.

In a discussion of the general causes of the war, and of its significance, the 
question of the “guilty party’ is completely beside the issue. Germany 
certainly has not the right to speak of a war of defence, but France and 
England have little more justification. They too are protecting, not their 
national, but their world political existence, their old imperialistic 
possessions, from the attacks of the German upstart. Doubtless the raids of 
German and Austrian imperialism in the Orient started the conflagration, but 
French imperialism, by devouring Morocco, and English imperialism, in its 
attempts to rape Mesopotamia, and all the other measures that were calculated 
to secure its rule of force in India, Russia’s Baltic policies, aiming toward 
Constantinople, all of these factors have carried together and piled up, brand 
for brand, the firewood that feeds the conflagration. If capitalist armaments 
have played an important role as the mainspring that times the outbreak of the 
catastrophe, it was a competition of armaments in all nations. And if Germany 
laid the cornerstone for European competitive armaments by Bismarck’s policy of 
1870, this policy was furthered by that of the second empire and by the 
military-colonial policies of the third empire, by its expansions in East Asia 
and in Africa.

The French socialists have some slight foundation for their illusion of 
“national defence,” because neither the French government nor the French people 
entertained the slightest warlike desires in July 1914. “Today everyone in 
France is honestly, uprightly and without reservation for peace,” insisted 
Jaurès in the last speech of his life, on the eve of the war, when he addressed 
a meeting in the People’s House in Brussels. This was absolutely true, and 
gives the psychological explanation for the indignation of the French 
socialists when this criminal war was forced upon their country. But this fact 
was not sufficient to determine the socialist attitude on the world war as a 
historic occurrence.

The events that bore the present war did not begin in July 1914 but reach back 
for decades. Thread by thread they have been woven together on the loom of an 
inexorable natural development until the firm net of imperialist world politics 
has encircled five continents. It is a huge historical complex of events, whose 
roots reach deep down into the Plutonic deeps of economic creation, whose 
outermost branches spread out and point away into a dimly dawning new world, 
events before whose all-embracing immensity, the conception of guilt and 
retribution, of defence and offence, sink into pale nothingness.

Imperialism is not the creation of any one or of any group of states. It is the 
product of a particular stage of ripeness in the world development of capital, 
an innately international condition, an indivisible whole, that is recognisable 
only in all its relations, and from which no nation can hold aloof at will. 
From this point of view only is it possible to understand correctly the 
question of “national defence!’ in the present war.

The national state, national unity and independence were the ideological shield 
under which the capitalist nations of central Europe constituted themselves in 
the past century. Capitalism is incompatible with economic and political 
divisions, with the accompanying splitting up into small states. It needs for 
its development large, united territories, and a state of mental and 
intellectual development in the nation that will lift the demands and needs of 
society to a plane corresponding to the prevailing stage of capitalist 
production, and to the mechanism of modern capitalist class rule. Before 
capitalism could develop, it sought to create for itself a territory sharply 
defined by national limitations. This program was carried out only in France at 
the time of the great revolution, for in the national and political heritage 
left to Europe by the feudal middle ages, this could be accomplished only by 
revolutionary measures. In the rest of Europe this nationalisation, like the 
revolutionary movement as a whole, remained the patchwork of half-kept 
promises. The German Empire, modern Italy, Austria-Hungary, and Turkey, the 
Russian Empire and the British world empire are all living proofs of this fact. 
The national program could play a historic role only so long as it represented 
the ideological expression of a growing bourgeoisie, lusting for power, until 
it had fastened its class rule, in some way or other, upon the great nations of 
central Europe and had created within them the necessary tools and conditions 
of its growth. Since then, imperialism has buried the old bourgeois democratic 
program completely by substituting expansionist activity irrespective of 
national relationships for the original program of the bourgeoisie in all 
nations. The national phase, to be sure, has been preserved, but its real 
content, its function, has been perverted into its very opposite. Today the 
nation is but a cloak that covers imperialistic desires, a battle cry for 
imperialistic rivalries, the last ideological measure with which the masses can 
be persuaded to play the role of cannon fodder in imperialistic wars.

This general tendency of present-day capitalist policies determines the 
policies of the individual states as their supreme blindly operating law, just 
as the laws of economic competition determine the conditions under which the 
individual manufacturer shall produce.

Let us assume for a moment, for the sake of argument, for the purpose of 
investigating this phantom of “national wars” that controls social democratic 
politics at the present time, that in one of the belligerent states, the war at 
its outbreak was purely one of national defence. Military success would 
immediately demand the occupation of foreign territory. But the existence of 
influential capitalist groups interested in imperialistic annexations will 
awaken expansionist appetites as the war goes on. The imperialistic tendency 
that, at the beginning of hostilities, may have been existent only in embryo, 
will shoot up and expand in the hothouse atmosphere of war until they will in a 
short time determine its character, its aims and its results.

Furthermore, the system of alliance between military states that has ruled the 
political relations of these nations for decades in the past makes it 
inevitable that each of the belligerent parties, in the course of war, should 
try to bring its allies to its assistance, again purely from motives of 
self-defence. Thus one country after another is drawn into the war, inevitably 
new imperialistic circles are touched and others are created. Thus England drew 
in Japan, and, spreading the war into Asia, has brought China into the circle 
of political problems and has influenced the existing rivalry between Japan and 
the United States, between England and Japan, thus heaping up new material for 
future conflicts. Thus Germany has dragged Turkey into the war, bringing the 
question of Constantinople, of the Balkans and of Western Asia directly into 
the foreground of affairs.

Even he who did not realise at the outset that the world war, in its causes, 
was purely imperialistic, cannot fail to see after a dispassionate view of its 
effects that war, under the present conditions, automatically and inevitably 
develops into a process of world division. This was apparent from the very 
first. The wavering balance of power between the two belligerent parties forces 
each, if only for military reasons, in order to strengthen its own position, or 
in order to frustrate possible attacks, to hold the neutral nations in check by 
intensive deals in peoples and nations, such as the German-Austrian offers to 
Italy, Rumania, Bulgaria and Greece on the one hand, and the English-Russian 
bids on the other. The “national war of defence” has the surprising effect of 
creating, even in the neutral nations, a general transformation of ownership 
and relative power, always in direct line with expansionist tendencies. Finally 
the fact that all modern capitalist states have colonial possessions that will, 
even though the war may have begun as a war of national defence, be drawn into 
the conflict from purely military considerations, the fact that each country 
will strive to occupy the colonial possessions of its opponent, or at least to 
create disturbances therein, automatically turns every war into an 
imperialistic world conflagration.

Thus the conception of even that modest, devout fatherland-loving war of 
defence that has become the ideal of our parliamentarians and editors is pure 
fiction, and shows, on their part, a complete lack of understanding of the 
whole war and its world relations. The character of the war is determined, not 
by solemn declaration, not even by the honest intentions of leading 
politicians, but by the momentary configuration of society and its military 
organisations. At the first glance the term “national war of defence” might 
seem applicable in the case of a country like Switzerland. But Switzerland is 
no national state, and, therefore, no object of comparison with other modern 
states. Its very “neutral” existence, its luxury of a militia are after all 
only the negative fruits of a latent state of war in the surrounding great 
military states. It will hold this neutrality only so long as it is willing to 
oppose this condition. How quickly such a neutral state is crushed by the 
military heel of imperialism in a world war the fate of Belgium shows.

This brings us to the peculiar position of the “small nation.” A classic 
example of such “national wars!’ is Serbia. If ever a state, according to 
formal considerations, had the right of national defence on its side, that 
state is Serbia. Deprived through Austrian annexations of its national unity, 
threatened by Austria in its very existence as a nation, forced by Austria into 
war, it is fighting, according to all human conceptions, for existence, for 
freedom, and for the civilisation of its people, But if the social democratic 
group is right in its position, then the Serbian social democrats who protested 
against the war in the parliament at Belgrade and refused to vote war credits 
are actually traitors to the most vital interests of their own nation. In 
reality the Serbian socialists Laptchevic and Kaclerovic have not only enrolled 
their names in letters of gold in the annals of the international socialist 
movement, but have shown a clear historical conception of the real causes of 
the war. In voting against war credits they therefore have done their country 
the best possible service. Serbia is formally engaged in a national war of 
defence. But its monarchy and its ruling classes are filled with expansionist 
desires as are the ruling classes in all modern states. They are indifferent to 
ethnic lines, and thus their warfare assumes an aggressive character. Thus 
Serbia is today reaching out toward the Adriatic coast where it is fighting out 
a real imperialistic conflict with Italy on the backs of the Albanians, a 
conflict whose final outcome will be decided not by either of the powers 
directly interested, but by the great powers that will speak the last word on 
terms of peace. But above all this we must not forget: behind Serbian 
nationalism stands Russian imperialism. Serbia itself is only a pawn in the 
great game of world politics. A judgment of the war in Serbia from a point of 
view that fails to take these great relations and the general world political 
background into account is necessarily without foundation.

The same is true of the recent Balkan War. Regarded as an isolated occurrence, 
the young Balkan states were historically justified in defending the old 
democratic program of the national state. In their historical connection, 
however, which makes the Balkan the burning point and the center of 
imperialistic world policies, these Balkan wars, also, were objectively only a 
fragment of the general conflict, a link in the chain of events that led, with 
fatal necessity, to the present world war. After the Balkan war the 
international social democracy tendered to the Balkan socialists, for their 
determined refusal to offer moral or political support to the war, a most 
enthusiastic ovation at the peace congress at Basel. In this act alone the 
International condemned in advance the position taken by the German and French 
socialists in the present war.

All small states, as for instance Holland, are today in a position like that of 
the Balkan states. “When the ship leaks, the hole must be stopped”; and what, 
forsooth, could little Holland fight for but for its national existence and for 
the independence of its people? If we consider here merely the determination of 
the Dutch people, even of its ruling classes, the question is doubtlessly one 
purely of national defence. But again proletarian politics cannot judge 
according to the subjective purposes of a single country. Here again it must 
take its position as a part of the International, according to the whole 
complexity of the world’s political situation. Holland, too, whether it wishes 
to be or not, is only a small wheel in the great machine of modern world 
politics and diplomacy. This would become clear at once, if Holland were 
actually torn into the maelstrom of the world war. Its opponents would direct 
their attacks against its colonies. Automatically Dutch warfare would turn to 
the defence of its present possessions. The defence of the national 
independence of the Dutch people on the North Sea would expand concretely to 
the defence of its rule and right of exploitation over the Malays in the East 
Indian Archipalego. But not enough: Dutch militarism, if forced to rely upon 
itself, would be crushed like a nutshell in the whirlpool of the world war. 
Whether it wished to or not it would become a member of one of the great 
national alliances. On one side or the other it must be the bearer and the tool 
of purely imperialistic tendencies.

Thus it is always the historic milieu of modern imperialism that determines the 
character of the war in the individual countries, and this milieu makes a war 
of national self-defence impossible.

Kautsky also expressed this, only a few years ago, in his pamphlet Patriotism 
and Social Democracy, Leipzig 1907, pages 12-14:

``“Though the patriotism of the bourgeoisie and of the proletariat are two 
entirely different, actually opposite, phenomena, there are situations in which 
both kinds of patriotism may join forces for united action, even in times of 
war. The bourgeoisie and the proletariat of a nation are equally interested in 
their national independence and self-determination, in the removal of all kinds 
of oppression and exploitation at the hands of a foreign nation. In the 
national conflicts that have sprung from such attempts, the patriotism of the 
proletariat has always united with that of the bourgeoisie. But the proletariat 
has become a power that may become dangerous to the ruling classes at every 
great national upheaval; revolution looms dark at the end of every war, as the 
Paris Commune of 1871 and Russian terrorism after the Russo-Japanese war have 
proven.

“In view of this the bourgeoisie of those nations which are not sufficiently 
united have actually sacrificed their national aims where these can be 
maintained only at the expense of the government for they hate and fear the 
revolution even more than they love national independence and greatness. For 
this reason, the bourgeoisie sacrifices the independence of Poland and permits 
ancient constellations like Austria and Turkey to remain in existence, though 
they have been doomed to destruction for more than a generation. National 
struggles as the bringers of revolution have ceased in civilised Europe. 
National problems that today can be solved only by war or revolution will be 
solved in the future only by the victory of the proletariat. But then, thanks 
to international solidarity, they will at once assume a form entirely different 
from that which prevails today in a social state of exploitation and 
oppression. In capitalist states this problem needs no longer to trouble the 
proletariat in its practical struggles. It must divert its whole strength to 
other problems.”``

“Meanwhile the likelihood that proletarian and bourgeois patriotism will unite 
to protect the liberty of the people is becoming more and more rare.” Kautsky 
then goes on to say that the French bourgeoisie has united with czarism, that 
Russia has ceased to be a danger for western Europe because it has been 
weakened by the revolution. “Under these circumstances a war in defence of 
national liberty in which bourgeois and proletarian may unite is nowhere to be 
expected” (ibid., p.16).

``“We have already seen that conflicts which, in the nineteenth century, might 
still have led some liberty-loving peoples to oppose their neighbours, by 
warfare, have ceased to exist. We have seen that modern militarism nowhere aims 
to defend important popular rights, but everywhere strives to support profits. 
It activities are dedicated not to assure the independence and invulnerability 
of its own nationality, that is nowhere threatened, but to the assurance and 
the extension of overseas conquests that again only serve the aggrandisement of 
capitalist profits. At the present time the conflicts between states can bring 
no war that proletarian interests would not, as a matter of duty, energetically 
oppose” (ibid., p.23).``

In view of all these considerations, what shall be the practical attitude of 
the social democracy in the present war? Shall it declare: since this is an 
imperialist war, since we do not enjoy in our country, any socialist 
self-determination, its existence or non-existence is of no consequence to us, 
and we will surrender it to the enemy? Passive fatalism can never be the role 
of a revolutionary party like the social democracy. It must neither place 
itself at the disposal of the existing class state, under the command of the 
ruling classes, nor can it stand silently by to wait until the storm is past. 
It must adopt a policy of active class politics, a policy that will whip the 
ruling classes forward in every great social crisis and that will drive the 
crisis itself far beyond its original extent. That is the role that the social 
democracy must play as the leader of the fighting proletariat.

Instead of covering this imperialist war with a lying mantle of national self – 
defence, the social democracy should have demanded the right of national 
self-determination seriously, should have used it as a lever against the 
imperialist war.

The most elementary demand of national defence is that the nation takes its 
defence into its own hands. The first step in this direction is the militia; 
not only the immediate armament of the entire adult male populace, but above 
all, popular decision in all questions of peace and war. It must demand, 
furthermore, the immediate removal of every form of political oppression, since 
the greatest political freedom is the best basis for national defence. To 
proclaim these fundamental measures of national defence, to demand their 
realisation, that was the first duty of the social democracy.

For forty years we have tried to prove to the ruling classes as well as to the 
masses of the people that only the militia is really able to defend the 
fatherland and to make it invincible. And yet, when the first test came, we 
turned over the defence of our country, as a matter of course, into the hands 
of the standing army to be the cannon fodder under the club of the ruling 
classes. Our parliamentarians apparently did not even notice that the fervent 
wishes with which they sped these defenders of the fatherland to the front 
were, to all intents and purposes, an open admission that the imperial Prussian 
standing army is the real defender of the fatherland. They evidently did not 
realise that by this admission they sacrificed the fulcrum of our political 
program, that they gave up the militia and dissolved the practical significance 
of forty years of agitation against the standing army into thin air. By the act 
of the social democratic group our military program became a utopian doctrine, 
a doctrinaire obsession, that none could possibly take seriously.

The masters of the international proletariat saw the idea of the defence of the 
fatherland in a different light. When the proletariat of Paris, surrounded by 
Prussians in 1871, took the reins of the government into its own hands, Marx 
wrote enthusiastically:

``“Paris, the center and seat of the old government powers, and simultaneously 
the social center of gravity of the French working class, Paris has risen in 
arms against the attempt of Monsieur Thiers and his Junkers to reinstate and 
perpetuate the government of the old powers of imperial rule. Paris was in a 
position to resist only, because through a state of siege, it was rid of its 
army, because in its place there had been put a national guard composed chiefly 
of working men. It was necessary that this innovation be made a permanent 
institution. The first act of the Commune was, therefore, the suppression of 
the standing army and the substitution of an armed people ... If now, the 
Commune was the true representative of all healthy elements of French society 
and, therefore, a true national government, it was likewise, as a proletarian 
government, as the daring fighter for the liberation of labour, international 
in the truest sense of that word. Under the eyes of the Prussian army, which 
has annexed two French provinces to Germany, the Commune has annexed the 
workers of a whole world to France?” (Address of the General Council of the 
International).``

But what did our masters say concerning the role to be played by the social 
democracy in the present war? In 1892 Friedrich Engels expressed the following 
opinion concerning the fundamental lines along which the attitude of 
proletarian parties in a great war should follow: “A war in the course of which 
Russians and Frenchmen should invade Germany would mean for the latter a life 
and death struggle. Under such circumstances it could assure its national 
existence only by using the most revolutionary methods. The present government, 
should it not be forced to do so, will certainly not bring on the revolution, 
but we have a strong party that may force its hand, or that, should it be 
necessary, can replace it, the Social Democratic Party.

``“We have not forgotten the glorious example of France in 1793. The one 
hundredth anniversary of 1793 is approaching. Should Russia’s desire for 
conquest, or the chauvinistic impatience of the French bourgeoisie check the 
victorious but peaceable march of the German socialists, the latter are 
prepared – be assured of that – to prove to the world that the German 
proletarians of today are not unworthy of the French Sansculottes, that 1893 
will be worthy of 1793. And should the soldiers of Monsieur Constans set foot 
upon German territory we will meet them with the words of the Marsellaise:

Shall hateful tyrants, mischief breeding,
With hireling host, a ruffian band,
Affright and desolate the land?

“In short, peace assures the victory of the Social Democratic Party in about 
ten years. The war will bring either victory in two or three years or its 
absolute ruin for at least fifteen or twenty years.”``

When Engels wrote these words, he had in mind a situation entirely different 
from the one existing today. In his mind’s eye, ancient czarism still loomed 
threateningly in the background. We have already seen the great Russian 
Revolution. He thought, furthermore, of a real national war of defence, of a 
Germany attacked on two sides, on the east and on the west by two enemy forces. 
Finally, he overestimated the ripeness of conditions in Germany and the 
likelihood of a social revolution, as all true fighters are wont to overrate 
the real tempo of development. But for all that, his sentences prove with 
remarkable clearness, that Engels meant by national defence, in the sense of 
the social democracy, not the support of a Prussian Junker military government 
and its Generalstab, but a revolutionary action after the example of the French 
Jacobins.

Yes, socialists should defend their country in great historical crises, and 
here lies the great fault of the German social democratic Reichstag group. When 
it announced on the fourth of August, “in this hour of danger, we will not 
desert our fatherland,” it denied its own words in the same breath. For truly 
it has deserted its fatherland in its hour of greatest danger. The highest duty 
of the social democracy toward its fatherland demanded that it expose the real 
background of this imperialist war, that it rend the net of imperialist and 
diplomatic lies that covers the eyes of the people. It was their duty to speak 
loudly and clearly, to proclaim to the people of Germany that in this war 
victory and defeat would be equally fatal, to oppose the gagging of the 
fatherland by a state of siege, to demand that the people alone decide on war 
and peace, to demand a permanent session of parliament for the period of the 
war, to assume a watchful control over the government by parliament, and over 
parliament by the people, to demand the immediate removal of all political 
inequalities, since only a free people can adequately govern its country, and 
finally, to oppose to the imperialist war, based as it was upon the most 
reactionary forces in Europe, the program of Marx, of Engels, and Lassalle.

That was the flag that should have waved over the country. That would have been 
truly national, truly free, in harmony with the best traditions of Germany and 
the international class policy of the proletariat.

The great historical hour of the world war obviously demanded unanimous 
political accomplishment, a broad-minded, comprehensive attitude that only the 
social democracy is destined to give. Instead, there followed, on the part of 
the parliamentary representatives of the working class, a miserable collapse. 
The social democracy did not adopt the wrong policy – it had no policy 
whatsoever. It has wiped itself out completely as a class party with a world 
conception of its own, has delivered the country, without a word of protest, to 
the fate of imperialist war without, to the dictatorship of the sword within. 
Nay more, it has taken the responsibility for the war upon its own shoulders. 
The declaration of the “Reichstag group;’ says: “We have voted only the means 
for our country’s defence. We decline all responsibility for the war.” But as a 
matter of fact, the truth lies in exactly the opposite direction. The means for 
“national defence,” i.e., for imperialistic mass butchery by the armed forces 
of the military monarchy, were not voted by the social democracy. For the 
availability of the war credits did not in the least depend upon the social 
democracy. They, as a minority, stood against a compact three-quarters majority 
of the capitalist Reichstag. The social democratic group accomplished only one 
thing by voting in favour of the war credits. It placed upon the war the stamp 
of democratic fatherland defence, and supported and sustained the fictions that 
were propagated by the government concerning the actual conditions and problems 
of the war.

Thus the serious dilemma between the national interests and international 
solidarity of the proletariat, the tragic conflict that made our 
parliamentarians fall “with heavy heart’ to the side of imperialistic warfare, 
was a mere figment of the imagination, a bourgeois nationalist fiction. Between 
the national interests and the class interests of the proletariat, in war and 
in peace. there is actually complete harmony. Both demand the most energetic 
prosecution of the class struggle, and the most determined insistence on the 
social democratic program.

But what action should the party have taken to give to our opposition to the 
war and to our war demands weight and emphasis? Should it have proclaimed a 
general strike? Should it have called upon the soldiers to refuse military 
service? Thus the question is generally asked. To answer with a simple yes or 
no were just as ridiculous as to decide: “When war breaks out we will start a 
revolution.” Revolutions are not “made” and great movements of the people are 
not produced according to technical recipes that repose in the pockets of the 
party leaders. Small circles of conspirators may organise a riot for a certain 
day and a certain hour, can give their small group of supporters the signal to 
begin. Mass movements in great historical crises cannot be initiated by such 
primitive measures.

The best prepared mass strike may break down miserably at the very moment when 
the party leaders give the signal, may collapse completely before the first 
attack. The success of the great popular movements depends, aye, the very time 
and circumstance of their inception is decided, by a number of economic, 
political and psychological factors. The existing degree of tension between the 
classes, the degree of intelligence of the masses and the degree or ripeness of 
their spirit of resistance – all these factors, which are incalculable, are 
premises that cannot be artificially created by any party. That is the 
difference between the great historical upheavals, and the small show – 
demonstrations that a well-disciplined party can carry out in times of peace, 
orderly, well-trained performances, responding obediently to the baton in the 
hands of the party leaders. The great historical hour itself creates the forms 
that will carry the revolutionary movements to a successful outcome, creates 
and improvises new weapons, enriches the arsenal of the people with weapons 
unknown and unheard of by the parties and their leaders.

What the social democracy as the advance guard of the class-conscious 
proletariat should have been able to give was not ridiculous precepts and 
technical recipes, but a political slogan, clearness concerning the political 
problems and interests of the proletariat in times of war.

For what has been said of mass strikes in the Russian Revolution is equally 
applicable to every mass movement:

``“While the revolutionary period itself commands the creation and the 
computation and payment of the cost of a mass strike, the leaders of the 
social-democracy have an entirely different mission to fill. Instead of 
concerning itself with the technical mechanism of the mass movement, it is the 
duty of the social democracy to undertake the political leadership even in the 
midst of a historical crisis. To give the slogan, to determine the direction of 
the struggle, to so direct the tactics of the political conflict that in its 
every phase and movement the whole sum of available and already mobilised 
active force of the proletariat is realised and finds expression in the 
attitude of the party, that the tactics of the social democracy in 
determination and vigour shall never be weaker than is justified by the actual 
power at its back, but shall rather hasten in advance of its actual power, that 
is the important problem of the party leadership in a great historical crisis. 
Then this leadership will become, in a sense, the technical leadership. A 
determined, consistent, progressive course of action on the part of the social 
democracy will create in the masses assurance, self-confidence and a fearless 
fighting spirit. A weakly vacillating course, based upon a low estimate of the 
powers of the proletariat, lames and confuses the masses. In the first case 
mass action will break out ‘of its own accord’ and ‘at the right time’; in the 
second, even a direct call to action on the part of the leaders often remains 
ineffectual” (The Mass Strike, The Political Party and the Trade Unions).``

Far more important than the outward, technical form of the action is its 
political content. Thus the parliamentary stage, for instance, the only far 
reaching and internationally conspicuous platform, could have become a mighty 
motive power for the awakening of the people, had it been used by the social 
democratic representatives to proclaim loudly and distinctly the interests, the 
problems and the demands of the working class.

“Would the masses have supported the social democracy in its attitude against 
the war?” That is a question that no one can answer. But neither is it an 
important one. Did our parliamentarians demand an absolute assurance of victory 
from the generals of the Prussian army before voting in favour of war credits? 
What is true of military armies is equally true of revolutionary armies. They 
go into the fight, wherever necessity demands it, without previous assurance of 
success. At the worst, the party would have been doomed, in the first few 
months of the war, to political ineffectuality.

Perhaps the bitterest persecutions would have been inflicted upon our party for 
its manly stand, as they were, in 1870, the reward of Liebknecht and Bebel. 
“But what does that matter,” said Ignaz Auer, simply, in his speech on the 
Sedanfeier in 1895. “A party that is to conquer the world must bear its 
principles aloft without counting the dangers that this may bring. To act 
differently is to be lost!”

``“It is never easy to swim against the current,” said the older Liebknecht 
“And when the stream rushes on with the rapidity and the power of a Niagara it 
does not become easier. Our older comrades still remember the hatred of that 
year of greatest national shame, under the socialist exception laws of 1878. At 
that time millions looked upon every social democrat as having played the part 
of a murderer and vile criminal in 1870; the socialist had been in the eyes of 
the masses a traitor and an enemy. Such outbreaks of the ‘popular soul’ are 
astounding, stunning, crushing in their elemental fury. One feels powerless, as 
before a higher power. It is a real force majeure. There is no tangible 
opponent. It is like an epidemic, in the people, in the air, everywhere.

“The outbreak of 1878 cannot, however, be compared with the outbreak in 1870. 
Ibis hurricane of human passions, breaking, bending, destroying all that stands 
in its way – and with it the terrible machinery of militarism, in fullest, most 
horrible activity; and we stand between the crushing iron wheels, whose touch 
means instant death, between iron arms, that threaten every moment to catch us. 
By the side of this elemental force of liberated spirits stood the most 
complete mechanism of the art of murder the world had hitherto seen; and all in 
the wildest activity, every boiler heated to the bursting point. At such a 
time, what is the will and the strength of the individual? Especially, when one 
feels that one represents a tiny minority, that one possesses no firm support 
in the people itself.

“At that time our party was still in a period of development. We were placed 
before the most serious test, at a time when we did not yet possess the 
organisation necessary to meet it. When the anti-socialist movement came in the 
year of shame of our enemies, in the year of honour for the social democracy, 
then we had already a strong, widespread organisation. Each and every one of us 
was strengthened by the feeling that he possessed a mighty support in the 
organised movement that stood behind him, and no sane person could conceive of 
the downfall of the party.

“So it was no small thing at that time to swim against the current. But what is 
to be done, must be done. And so we gritted our teeth in the face of the 
inevitable. There was no time for fear ... Certainly Bebel and I ... never for 
a moment thought of the warning. We did not retreat. We had to hold our posts, 
come what might!”``

They stuck to their posts, and for forty years the social democracy lived upon 
the moral strength with which it had opposed a world of enemies.

The same thing would have happened now. At first we would perhaps have 
accomplished nothing but to save the honour of the proletariat, and thousands 
upon thousands of proletarians who are dying in the trenches in mental darkness 
would not have died in spiritual confusion, but with the one certainty that 
that which has been everything in their lives, the international, liberating 
social democracy is more than the figment of a dream.

The voice of our party would have acted as a wet blanket upon the chauvinistic 
intoxication of the masses. It would have preserved the intelligent proletariat 
from delirium, would have it more difficult for imperialism to poison and to 
stupefy the minds of the people. The crusade against the social democracy would 
have awakened the masses in an incredibly short time.

And as the war went on, as the horror of endless massacre and bloodshed in all 
countries grew and grew, as its imperialistic hoof became more and more 
evident, as the exploitation by bloodthirsty speculators became more and more 
shameless, every live, honest, progressive and humane element in the masses 
would have rallied to the standard of the social democracy. The German social 
democracy would have stood in the midst of this mad whirlpool of collapse and 
decay, like a rock in a stormy sea, would have been the lighthouse of the whole 
International, guiding and leading the labour movements of every country of the 
earth. The unparalleled moral prestige that lay in the hands of the German 
socialists would have reacted upon the socialists of all nations in a very 
short time. Peace sentiments would have spread like wildfire and the popular 
demand for peace in all countries would have hastened the end of the slaughter, 
would have decreased the number of its victims.

The German proletariat would have remained the lighthouse keeper of socialism 
and of human emancipation.

Truly this was a task not unworthy of the disciples of Marx, Engels and 
Lassalle.




Chapter 8

In spite of the military dictatorship and censorship of the press, in spite of 
the abdication of the Social Democrats, in spite of the fratricidal war, the 
class struggle rises with elemental force from out of the Burgfrieden;[1] and 
the international solidarity of labor from out of the bloody mists of the 
battlefield. Not in the weak and artificial attempts to galvanize the old 
International, not in pledges renewed here and there to stand together again 
after the war. No! Now in and from the war the fact emerges with a wholly new 
power and energy that the proletarians of all lands have one and the same 
interests. The war itself dispels the illusion it has created.

Victory or defeat? Thus sounds the slogan of the ruling militarism in all the 
warring countries, and, like an echo, the Social Democratic leaders have taken 
it up. Supposedly, victory or defeat on the battlefield should be for the 
proletarians of Germany, France, England, or Russia exactly the same as for the 
ruling classes of these countries. As soon as the cannons thunder, every 
proletarian should be interested in the victory of his own country and, 
therefore, in the defeat of the other countries. Let us see what such a victory 
can bring to the proletariat.

According to official version, adopted uncritically by the Social Democratic 
leaders, German victory holds the prospect of unlimited economic growth, while 
defeat means economic ruin. This conception rests upon the pattern of the war 
of 1870. However, the flourishing capitalism following that war was not the 
consequence of the war but of the political unification, even though this came 
in the crippled form of Bismarck’s German Empire. Economic growth proceeded out 
of unification despite the war and the many reactionary obstacles that came in 
its wake. What the victorious war contributed to all this was the entrenchment 
of the military monarchy in Germany and the rule of the Prussian Junkers; the 
defeat of France helped liquidate the [Second] Empire and establish the [Third] 
Republic.

But today matters are quite different in the belligerent states. Today war does 
not function as a dynamic method of procuring for rising young capitalism the 
preconditions of its “national” development. War has this character only in the 
isolated and fragmentary case of Serbia. Reduced to its historically objective 
essence, today’s world war is entirely a competitive struggle amongst fully 
mature capitalisms for world domination, for the exploitation of the remaining 
zones of the world not yet capitalistic. That is why this war is totally 
different in character and effects. The high degree of economic development in 
the capitalist world is expressed in the extraordinarily advanced technology, 
that is, in the destructive power of the weaponry which approaches the same 
level in all the warring nations. The international organization of the murder 
industry is reflected now in the military balance, the scales of which always 
right themselves after partial decisions and momentary changes; a general 
decision is always and again pushed into the future. The indecisiveness of 
military results leads to ever new reserves from the population masses of 
warring and hitherto neutral nations being sent into fire. The war finds 
abundant material to feed imperialist appetites and contradictions, creates its 
own supplies of these, and spreads like wildfire. But the mightier the masses 
and the more numerous the nations dragged into the war on all sides, the more 
drawn out its existence will be.

Considered all together, and before any decision regarding military victory or 
defeat has been taken, the effect of the war will be unlike any phenomenon of 
earlier wars in the modern age: the economic ruin of all belligerents and to an 
increasing degree that of the formally neutral as well. Every additional month 
of the war affirms and extends this result and postpones the expected fruits of 
military success for decades. In the last analysis, neither victory nor defeat 
can change any of this. On the contrary, it makes a purely military decision 
extremely unlikely and leads one to conclude the greater probability that the 
war will end finally with the most general and mutual exhaustion.

In these circumstances a victorious Germany would win but a Pyrrhic victory, 
even should its imperialistic warmongers succeed in the total defeat of all its 
enemies through mass murder and thus realize its audacious dream. [Germany’s] 
trophies would be: a few beggared and depopulated territories to annex. Under 
its own roof would be a leering ruin. And once the stage scenery of war loan 
financing and the Potemkin villages[2] of war contracts and unshakable national 
prosperity are pushed aside it will be immediately seen [as the ruin it is]. It 
must be clear even to the most superficial observer that the most victorious 
state can not expect any reparations that would even come close to healing the 
wounds inflicted by this war. A replacement for this and a complement of 
“victory” would be the perhaps even greater economic ruin of the conquered 
side: France and England, the very countries most closely connected 
economically to Germany and upon whose welfare she is most dependent for her 
own recovery. After a “victorious” war the German people would have to pay back 
the war credits granted by the patriotic parliament, that is, in reality have 
to bear an immense burden of taxation while enduring a strengthened military 
reaction – the only lasting, tangible fruit of “victory.”

If we seek to imagine the worst results of a [military] defeat, then, aside 
from the imperialist annexations, they present feature for feature essentially 
the same consequences as would have issued from victory. The consequences of 
waging war are today so deeply embedded and far-reaching in nature that the 
military outcome has only minimal effects upon it.

Nevertheless, let us accept for the moment, that the victorious state would 
understand how to throw off the burden of great ruin from itself onto its 
defeated opponent and to hamstring its economic development with all sorts of 
obstacles. Can the trade union struggles of the German working class go forward 
after the war if the union action of the French, English, Belgian, and Italian 
workers is thwarted by economic regression? Until 1870 the workers’ movement 
operated independently in each country; sometimes key decisions were taken in 
individual cities. It was in Paris on whose cobblestones the battles of the 
proletariat were joined and decided. The labor movement of today, [because of] 
its more arduous daily economic struggle, bases its mass organization on 
cooperation [with worker movements] in all capitalist countries. If the 
principle is valid that the workers’ cause can flourish only on the basis of a 
healthy, powerfully pulsating economic life, then it is valid not only for 
Germany but also for France, England, Belgium, Russia, Italy. And if the 
workers’ movement stagnates in all the capitalist countries of Europe, if there 
exist low wages, weak unions, and slight resistance to exploitation, then it 
will be impossible for the trade union movement to thrive in Germany. From this 
standpoint and in the last analysis, it is exactly the same loss for the 
situation of the proletariat if German capitalism enriches itself at the cost 
of the French or the English at the cost of the German.

Let us turn, however, to the political results of the war. Here differentiation 
ought to be easier than in the economic area. Historically, the sympathies and 
partisanship of the socialists have been on the side fighting for historical 
progress and against reaction. Which side in the present war represents 
progress and which reaction? Clearly, this question cannot be answered on the 
basis of the superficial labels of the warring states, such as “democracy” or 
“absolutism.” Rather, [the question should be judged] on the actual objective 
tendencies they represent in world politics. Before we can judge what benefits 
a German victory would bring to the German proletariat, we must see what the 
effects [of such a victory] would have upon the overall shape of European 
political relationships.

The definitive victory of Germany would result in the immediate annexation of 
Belgium, as well as additional strips of territory in east and west, wherever 
feasible, and a part of the French colonies. The Habsburg monarchy would be 
preserved and enriched with new regions. Finally, Turkey, retaining a fictional 
“integrity,” would become a German protectorate which would mean the 
simultaneous transformation of the Middle East into de facto German provinces, 
whatever the form. The actual military and economic hegemony of Germany in 
Europe would logically follow these results.

These results of a decisive German military victory will come about, not 
because they correspond to the wishes of imperialist agitators in this war, but 
because they are the wholly inevitable consequences emanating from Germany’s 
position in the world and from the original conflicts with England, France, and 
Russia that have grown tremendously beyond their initial dimensions during the 
course of the war. It will suffice to put these results into context by 
understanding that under no circumstances will it be possible to maintain any 
sort of balance of power in the world.

The war means ruin for all the belligerents, although more so for the defeated. 
On the day after the concluding of peace, preparations for a new world war will 
be begun under the leadership of England in order to throw off the yoke of 
Prusso-German militarism burdening Europe and the Near East. A German victory 
would be only a prelude to a soon-to-follow second world war; and this would be 
the signal for a new, feverish arms race as well as the unleashing of the 
blackest reaction in all countries, but first and foremost in Germany itself.

On the other hand, an Anglo-French victory would most probably lead to the loss 
of at least some German colonies, as well as Alsace-Lorraine. Quite certain 
would be the bankruptcy of German imperialism on the world stage. But that also 
means the partition of Austria-Hungary and the total liquidation of Turkey. The 
fall of such arch-reactionary creatures as these two states is wholly in 
keeping with the demands of progressive development. [But] the fall of the 
Habsburg monarchy as well as Turkey, in the concrete situation of world 
politics, can have no other effect than to put their peoples in pawn to Russia, 
England, France, and Italy. Add to this grandiose redrawing of the world map 
power shifts in the Balkans and the Mediterranean and a further one in Asia. 
The liquidation of Persia and a new dismemberment of China will inevitably 
follow.

In the wake [of these changes] the English-Russian, as well as the 
English-Japanese, conflict will move into the foreground of world politics. And 
directly upon the liquidation of this world war, these [conflicts] may lead to 
a new world war, perhaps over Constantinople, and would certainly make it 
likely. Thus, from this side, too, [an Anglo-French] victory would lead to a 
new feverish armaments race among all the states – with defeated Germany 
obviously in the forefront. An era of unalloyed militarism and reaction would 
dominate all Europe with a new world war as its ultimate goal.

Thus proletarian policy is locked in a dilemma when trying to decide on which 
side it ought to intervene, which side represents progress and democracy in 
this war. In these circumstances, and from the perspective of international 
politics as a whole, victory or defeat, in political as well as economic terms, 
comes down to a hopeless choice between two kinds of beatings for the European 
working classes. Therefore, it is nothing but fatal madness when the French 
socialists imagine that the military defeat of Germany will strike a blow at 
the head of militarism and imperialism and thereby pave the way for peaceful 
democracy in the world. Imperialism and its servant, militarism, will calculate 
their profits from every victory and every defeat in this war – except in one 
case: if the international proletariat intervenes in a revolutionary way and 
puts an end to such calculations.

This war’s most important lesson for the policy of the proletariat is the 
unassailable fact that it cannot parrot the slogan Victory or Defeat, not in 
Germany or in France, not in England or in Russia. Only from the standpoint of 
imperialism does this slogan have any real content. For every Great Power it is 
identical to the question of gain or loss of political standing, of 
annexations, colonies, and military predominance. From the standpoint of class 
for the European proletariat as a whole the victory and defeat of any of the 
warring camps is equally disastrous.

It is war as such, no matter how it ends militarily, that signifies the 
greatest defeat for Europe’s proletariat. It is only the overcoming of war and 
the speediest possible enforcement of peace by the international militancy of 
the proletariat that can bring victory to the workers’ cause. And in reality 
this victory alone can simultaneously rescue Belgium as well as democracy in 
Europe.

The class-conscious proletariat cannot identify with any of the military camps 
in this war. Does it follow that proletarian policy ought to demand maintenance 
of the status quo, that we have no other action program beyond the wish that 
everything should be as it was before the war? But existing conditions have 
never been our ideal; they have never expressed the self-determination of 
peoples. Furthermore, the earlier conditions are no longer to be saved; they no 
longer exist, even if historic state borders continue to exist. Even before its 
results have been formally established, the war has already brought about 
immense confusion in power relationships, the reciprocal estimate of forces, of 
alliances, and conflicts. It has sharply revised the relations between states 
and of classes within society. So many old illusions and potencies have been 
destroyed, so many new forces and problems have been created that a return to 
the old Europe as it existed before August 4, 1914 is out of the question. [It 
is] as out of the question as a return to pre-revolutionary conditions even 
after a defeated revolution.

Proletarian policy knows no retreat; it can only struggle forward. It must 
always go beyond the existing and the newly created. In this sense alone, it is 
legitimate for the proletariat to confront both camps of imperialists in the 
world war with a policy of its own.

But this policy can not consist of social democratic parties holding 
international conferences where they individually or collectively compete to 
discover ingenious recipes with which bourgeois diplomats ought to make the 
peace and ensure the further peaceful development of democracy. All demands for 
complete or partial “disarmament,” for the dismantling of secret diplomacy, for 
the partition of all multinational great states into small national one, and so 
forth are part and parcel utopian as long as capitalist class domination holds 
the reins. [Capitalism] cannot, under its current imperialist course, dispense 
with present-day militarism, secret diplomacy, or the centralized multinational 
state. In fact, it would be more pertinent for the realization of these 
postulates to make just one simple “demand”: abolition of the capitalist class 
state.

It is not through utopian advice and schemes to tame, ameliorate, or reform 
imperialism within the framework of the bourgeois state that proletarian policy 
can reconquer its leading place. The actual problem that the world war has 
posed to the socialist parties, upon the solution of which the destiny of the 
workers’ movement depends, is this: the capacity of the proletarian masses for 
action in the battle against imperialism. The proletariat does not lack for 
postulates, prognoses, slogans; it lacks deeds, the capacity for effective 
resistance to imperialism at the decisive moment, to intervene against it 
during [not after] the war and to convert the old slogan “war against war” into 
practice. Here is the crux of the matter, the Gordian knot of proletarian 
politics and its long term future.

Imperialism and all its political brutality, the chain of incessant social 
catastrophes that it has let loose, is undoubtedly an historical necessity for 
the ruling classes of the contemporary capitalist world. Nothing would be more 
fatal for the proletariat than to delude itself into believing that it were 
possible after this war to rescue the idyllic and peaceful continuation of 
capitalism. However, the conclusion to be drawn by proletarian policy from the 
historical necessity of imperialism is that surrender to imperialism will mean 
living forever in its victorious shadow and eating from its leftovers.

The historical dialectic moves forward by contradiction, and establishes in the 
world the antithesis of every necessity. Bourgeois class domination is 
undoubtedly an historical necessity, but, so too, the rising of the working 
class against it. Capital is an historical necessity, but, so too, its grave 
digger, the socialist proletariat. Imperialist world domination is an 
historical necessity, but, so too, its destruction by the proletarian 
international. Step for step there are two historical necessities in conflict 
with one another. Ours, the necessity of socialism, has the greater stamina. 
Our necessity enters into its full rights the moment that the other - bourgeois 
class domination – ceases to be the bearer of historical progress, when it 
becomes an obstacle, a danger to the further development of society. The 
capitalist world order, as revealed by the world war, has today reached this 
point.

The expansionist imperialism of capitalism, the expression of its highest stage 
of development and its last phase of existence, produces the [following] 
economic tendencies: it transforms the entire world into the capitalist mode of 
production; all outmoded, pre-capitalist forms of production and society are 
swept away; it converts all the world’s riches and means of production into 
capital, the working masses of all zones into wage slaves. In Africa and Asia, 
from the northernmost shores to the tip of South America and the South Seas, 
the remnant of ancient primitive communist associations, feudal systems of 
domination, patriarchal peasant economies, traditional forms of craftsmanship 
are annihilated, crushed by capital; whole peoples are destroyed and ancient 
cultures flattened. All are supplanted by profit mongering in its most modern 
form.

This brutal victory parade of capital through the world, its way prepared by 
every means of violence, robbery, and infamy, has its light side. It creates 
the preconditions for its own final destruction. It put into place the 
capitalist system of world domination, the indispensable precondition for the 
socialist world revolution. This alone constitutes the cultural, progressive 
side of its reputed “great work of civilization” in the primitive lands. For 
bourgeois-liberal economists and politicians, railroads, Swedish matches, sewer 
systems, and department stores are “progress” and “civilization.” In themselves 
these works grafted onto primitive conditions are neither civilization nor 
progress, for they are bought with the rapid economic and cultural ruin of 
peoples who must experience simultaneously the full misery and horror of two 
eras: the traditional natural economic system and the most modern and rapacious 
capitalist system of exploitation. Thus, the capitalist victory parade and all 
its works bear the stamp of progress in the historical sense only because they 
create the material preconditions for the abolition of capitalist domination 
and class society in general. And in this sense imperialism ultimately works 
for us.

The world war is a turning point. For the first time, the ravening beasts set 
loose upon all quarters of the globe by capitalist Europe have broken into 
Europe itself. A cry of horror went through the world when Belgium, that 
precious jewel of European civilization, and when the most august cultural 
monuments of northern France fell into shards under the impact of the blind 
forces of destruction. This same “civilized world” looked on passively as the 
same imperialism ordained the cruel destruction of ten thousand Herero 
tribesmen and filled the sands of the Kalahari with the mad shrieks and death 
rattles of men dying of thirst;[3] [the “civilized world” looked on] as forty 
thousand men on the Putumayo River [Columbia] were tortured to death within ten 
years by a band of European captains of industry, while the rest of the people 
were made into cripples; as in China where an age-old culture was put to the 
torch by European mercenaries, practiced in all forms of cruelty, annihilation, 
and anarchy; as Persia was strangled, powerless to resist the tightening noose 
of foreign domination; as in Tripoli where fire and sword bowed the Arabs 
beneath the yoke of capitalism, destroyed their culture and habitations. Only 
today has this “civilized world” become aware that the bite of the imperialist 
beast brings death, that its very breath is infamy. Only now has [the civilized 
world] recognized this, after the beast’s ripping talons have clawed its own 
mother’s lap, the bourgeois civilization of Europe itself. And even this 
knowledge is grappled with in the distorted form of bourgeois hypocrisy. Every 
people recognizes the infamy only in the national uniform of the enemy. “German 
barbarians!” – as though every people that marches out to do organized murder 
were not transformed instantly into a barbarian horde. “Cossack atrocities!” – 
as though war itself were not the atrocity of atrocities, as though the 
praising of human slaughter as heroism in a socialist youth paper were not the 
purest example of intellectual cossack-dom!

None the less, the imperialist bestiality raging in Europe’s fields has one 
effect about which the “civilized world” is not horrified and for which it has 
no breaking heart: that is the mass destruction of the European proletariat. 
Never before on this scale has a war exterminated whole strata of the 
population; not for a century have all the great and ancient cultural nations 
of Europe been attacked. Millions of human lives have been destroyed in the 
Vosges, the Ardennes, in Belgium, Poland, in the Carpathians, on the Save. 
Millions have been crippled. But of these millions, nine out of ten are working 
people from the city and the countryside.

It is our strength, our hope, that is mown down day after day like grass under 
the sickle. The best, most intelligent, most educated forces of international 
socialism, the bearers of the holiest traditions and the boldest heroes of the 
modern workers’ movement, the vanguard of the entire world proletariat, the 
workers of England, France, Belgium, Germany, Russia – these are the ones now 
being hamstrung and led to the slaughter. These workers of the leading 
capitalist countries of Europe are exactly the ones who have the historical 
mission of carrying out the socialist transformation. Only from out of Europe, 
only from out of the oldest capitalist countries will the signal be given when 
the hour is ripe for the liberating social revolution. Only the English, 
French, Belgian, German, Russian, Italian workers together can lead the army of 
the exploited and enslaved of the five continents. When the time comes, only 
they can settle accounts with capitalism’s work of global destruction, with its 
centuries of crime committed against primitive peoples.

But to push ahead to the victory of socialism we need a strong, activist, 
educated proletariat, and masses whose power lies in intellectual culture as 
well as numbers. These masses are being decimated by the world war. The flower 
of our mature and youthful strength, hundreds of thousands of whom were 
socialistically schooled in England, France, Belgium, Germany, and Russia, the 
product of decades of educational and agitational training, and other hundreds 
of thousands who could be won for socialism tomorrow, fall and molder on the 
miserable battlefields. The fruits of decades of sacrifice and the efforts of 
generations are destroyed in a few weeks. The key troops of the international 
proletariat are torn up by the roots.

The blood-letting of the June days [1848] paralyzed the French workers’ 
movement for a decade and a half. Then the blood-letting of the Commune 
massacres again retarded it for more than a decade. What is now occurring is an 
unprecedented mass slaughter that is reducing the adult working population of 
all the leading civilized countries to women, old people, and cripples. This 
blood-letting threatens to bleed the European workers’ movement to death. 
Another such world war and the outlook for socialism will be buried beneath the 
rubble heaped up by imperialist barbarism. This is more [significant] than the 
ruthless destruction of Liege and the Rheims cathedral. This is an assault, not 
on the bourgeois culture of the past, but on the socialist culture of the 
future, a lethal blow against that force which carries the future of humanity 
within itself and which alone can bear the precious treasures of the past into 
a better society. Here capitalism lays bear its death’s head; here it betrays 
the fact that its historical rationale is used up; its continued domination is 
no longer reconcilable to the progress of humanity.

The world war today is demonstrably not only murder on a grand scale; it is 
also suicide of the working classes of Europe. The soldiers of socialism, the 
proletarians of England, France, Germany, Russia, and Belgium have for months 
been killing one another at the behest of capital. They are driving the cold 
steel of murder into each other’s hearts. Locked in the embrace of death, they 
tumble into a common grave.

“Deutschland, Deutschland über Alles! Long live democracy! Long live the Tsar 
and Slav-dom! Ten thousand tarpaulins guaranteed up to regulations! A hundred 
thousand kilos of bacon, coffee-substitute for immediate delivery!” ... 
Dividends are rising, and the proletarians are falling. And with every one 
there sinks into the grave a fighter of the future, a soldier of the 
revolution, mankind’s savior from the yoke of capitalism.

The madness will cease and the bloody demons of hell will vanish only when 
workers in Germany and France, England and Russia finally awake from their 
stupor, extend to each other a brotherly hand, and drown out the bestial chorus 
of imperialist war-mongers and the shrill cry of capitalist hyenas with labor’s 
old and mighty battle cry:
Proletarians of all lands, unite!

Footnotes

[1] The Burgfrieden, literally the “peace of the castle” imposed upon all those 
seeking shelter in a fortified spot during the Middle Ages, signified the 
political truce agreed upon by the political parties represented in the 
Reichstag at the outbreak of the war. After voting the credits that made the 
war financially possible, members of the Reichstag suspended further elections 
for the duration of hostilities and declared a cessation of “politics.” 
Essentially, the civilian sector abdicated its responsibility to participate in 
policy making, leaving all major decisions in the hands of the Kaiser’s 
government and then in those of the general staff of the armed forces. This 
behavior contrasted sharply with that of the western democracies where, all 
through the war, it was “politics as usual.” Only toward the end of the war, 
did the Reichstag reconquer some of the lost ground of 1914.

[2] Count Gregory Alexandrovich Potemkin (1724-91) was said to have deceived 
Catherine the Great of Russia with cardboard facades of new villages he was 
supposed to have constructed.

[3] The Herero tribesmen rebelled against German control of their homeland in 
Southwest Africa, 1903–07. During the brutal wars of pacification, German 
troops forced men, women, and children into the Kalahari desert where many 
perished. The extraction of rubber from along the Putumayo River was 
accompanied by horrifying exploitation of native laborers.